<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR891011-0013 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.10-11-89.f2.A1012</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="52">7 CFR Part 968 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. AO Fandamp;V 88-1; FV-88-110] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Seedless European Cucumbers Grown in the United States; RecommendedDecision and Opportunity to File Written Exceptions to Proposed MarketingAgreement and Order </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Agricultural Marketing Service, USDA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This recommended decision proposes a marketing agreementand order regulating the handling of seedless European cucumbers, morecommonly known as ``greenhouse cucumbers'', grown in the United Statesof America. The order would authorize the establishment of grade, size,quality, maturity, container and pack regulations to promote the qualityand standardize the pack of greenhouse cucumbers shipped to fresh markets.In addition, it would authorize production research and marketing researchand development activities to improve production practices, reduce costsand increase the consumption of greenhouse cucumbers. Consumers would benefitby being provided with a reliable supply of good quality product, and producersand handlers would benefit from the resulting consumer confidence and increasedacceptance and sales of the product. The program would be administeredby an eleven member committee consisting of seven producers, three handlersand a public member, and would be financed by assessments levied on greenhousecucumber handlers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>Written exceptions to this recommended decision must bereceived by November 13, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Four copies of written exceptions should be sent to theHearing Clerk, United States Department of Agriculture, Room 1079, SouthBuilding, Washington, DC 20250-9200. All written exceptions will be availablefor public inspection at the office of the Hearing Clerk during regularbusiness hours [7 CFR 1.27(b)].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Virginia Olson, Marketing OrderAdministration Branch, Fruit and Vegetable Division, AMS, USDA, P.O. Box96456, Room 2525-S, Washington, DC 20090-6456; telephone (202) 475-3930.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>Prior documents in this proceeding:Notice of Hearing_Issued June 22, 1988, and published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on June 27, 1988 [53 FR 24070]. This administrative action is governed by the provisions of sections 556and 557 of Title 5 of the United States Code, and therefore is excludedfrom the requirements of Executive Order 12291. <T3>Preliminary Statement: </T3>Notice is hereby given of the filing withthe Hearing Clerk of this recommended decision with respect to a proposedmarketing agreement and order regulating the handling of greenhouse cucumbersgrown in the fifty States of the United States of America and the Districtof Columbia, hereinafter referred to as the proposed order. This noticeis issued pursuant to the provisions of the Agricultural Marketing AgreementAct of 1937, as amended [7 U.S.C. 601-674], hereinafter referred to asthe ``Act,'' and the applicable rules of practice and procedure governingthe formulation of marketing agreements and marketing orders [7 CFR part900]. The proposed order was formulated on the record of a public hearing heldin Sacramento, California, on July 26-28, 1988. Notice of the hearing waspublished in the June 27, 1988, issue of the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The notice set forth a proposed order submittedby the American Greenhouse Vegetable Growers Association (AGVGA) whichrepresents a sizable portion of the greenhouse cucumber industry. At thehearing, a number of witnesses, including producers, handlers, a scientificresearcher, a consumer, and an economist, testified in support of the order.Proponents emphasized that greenhouse cucumber producers need a marketingorder if they are to continue to operate viable businesses and expand markets.They offered evidence in support of their position. In general, witnesses testified that a marketing order for greenhouse cucumbersthat allows the establishment of grade, size, quality, maturity, container,and pack regulations would improve the quality and standardize the packof greenhouse cucumbers in the marketplace. The proposed order would enablethe establishment of programs and projects relating to production and marketingresearch, consumer education, promotion, and market development which couldresult in reduced costs and increased sales. In addition, one brief was filed by George H. Soares on behalf of the AGVGA.The brief in general reaffirmed the testimony presented at the hearingin support of the proposed marketing order with regard to such issues as:(1) Industry support for the proposed order; (2) the basis used in formulatingthe proposed production area; (3) eligibility requirements for producers;(4) the impact of the proposed order on small entities; and (5) the mostappropriate method for assessing greenhouse cucumbers. Also, the briefincluded several proposed amendments to the order, which are discussedherein, as appropriate. <T3>Small Business Consideration: </T3>In accordance with the provisionsof the Regulatory Flexibility Act (RFA) [5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et. seq.</T3>], the Administrator of the Agricultural Marketing Servicehas determined that this action would not have a significant economic impacton a substantial number of small entities. Small agricultural producershave been defined by the Small Business Administration (SBA) [13 CFR 121.2]as those having average annual gross revenues for the last three yearsof less than $500,000. Small agricultural service firms, which would includehandlers under this proposed order, are defined as those with gross annualrevenues of less than $3.5 million. The purpose of the RFA is to fit regulatory actions to the scale of businesssubject to such actions in order that small businesses will not be undulyor disproportionately burdened. The Act requires the application of uniformrules to regulated handlers. Marketing orders issued pursuant to the Act,and rules issued thereunder are unique in that they are normally broughtabout through group action of essentially small entities acting on theirown behalf. Thus, both the RFA and the Act are compatible with respectto small business entities. Interested persons were invited to presentevidence at the hearing on the reporting requirements and probable economicimpact that the proposed order would have on small businesses. The record indicates that there are approximately 250 handlers of greenhousecucumbers in the United States, with all but about 20 also in the businessof growing greenhouse cucumbers. During the 1987-88 season, U.S. productionof greenhouse cucumbers was estimated to be about 38 million pounds, orthe equivalent of 2.4 million 16-pound boxes. Testimony indicates thatin recent seasons, f.o.b. prices have averaged about $8.00 per box, whichwould yield a total value of about $19 million. While there is a greatvariance in size of individual handler operations, the record indicatesthat most of the handlers that would be regulated under the proposed orderwould qualify as small firms under SBA's definition.The record also indicates that there are between 250 and 300 greenhousecucumber producers in the United States. The largest greenhouse cucumberproducer has 22-acres of growing area, but all others operate substantiallysmaller greenhouses. The record indicates that the average size of a greenhousecucumber growing operation is about 18,500 square feet or four-tenths ofan acre. With gross annual receipts of $175,000 to $250,000 per acre, therecord indicates that the vast majority of these producers could be classifiedas small businesses. Witnesses testified that because most greenhouse cucumber producers andhandlers are small businesses, a marketing order program is necessary toprovide a means for these entities to pool their resources and work togetherto solve common problems. Witnesses testified that such action is necessaryfor the greenhouse cucumber industry to provide a uniform, quality productto consumers and expand markets. The proposed order would authorize a number of requirements that may beimposed upon handlers. Principal requirements which could impact handlersinclude: standardized container and pack specifications; minimum standardsof quality and size; mandatory inspection; payment of assessments; andassociated reporting and recordkeeping. Container and pack specifications could be used to limit the types of containerswhich may be used by handlers to ship greenhouse cucumbers, and how thosegreenhouse cucumbers must  be packed. Quality and size restrictions couldbe established to remove from fresh market channels less desirable gradesand sizes of greenhouse cucumbers. The establishment of these types ofregulations would likely require the mandatory inspection of greenhousecucumbers destined for fresh market with costs paid by handlers. The potentialimpacts of these requirements are discussed in detail elsewhere in thisdecision. In summary, the record evidence indicates that in any considerationof regulatory requirements, the committee should give due considerationto the impacts those requirements would have on small businesses and reportthe expected impacts to the Secretary and the industry. In the event itis deemed necessary to provide relief from certain requirements, the proposedorder authorizes a number of exemptions. For example, provision has beenmade to allow small quantities of greenhouse cucumbers to be marketed withoutregard to the regulatory requirements that may be in effect. Additionally,waivers from the inspection requirement could be obtained when it was determinedthat inspection would not be practicable. The order would be administered by a committee of greenhouse cucumber growersand handlers, and all recommendations for handling requirements would requirethe review and approval of the Secretary. The burden of these regulatoryrequirements should not be significant compared to the benefits which shouldaccrue to the regulated businesses. For example, it was testified thatuniform pack and container requirements should result in cost savings andreduced confusion on the part of buyers. If lower quality and smaller sizeswere eliminated from fresh market channels, demand for higher quality andpreferred sizes should increase. The program would be financed by assessments paid by greenhouse cucumberhandlers. While the assessment rate that may be levied is not specifiedin the proposed order, it would have to be established at a rate sufficientto generate adequate revenue to cover the operating costs of a nationalprogram such as that proposed herein. Expenses would include committeestaff salaries and travel expenses for committee members and staff, aswell as other administrative expenses relating to establishing and equippingan office such as rent, utilities, postage and office equipment. Additionally,assessment funds would be used to fund any production research projectsand promotion activities undertaken by the committee and to establish andmaintain an effective program for assuring compliance with program requirements.While the rate of assessment is not specified in the proposed order, testimonyindicates that an assessment in the range of .5 to 1.5 cents per greenhousecucumber may be an appropriate and acceptable amount to accomplish thepurposes of the order. At these rates, the estimated 38 million poundsof greenhouse cucumbers produced in 1987-88 would have generated totalassessment income of $190,000 to $570,000. With wholesale prices averagingabout 50 cents per greenhouse cucumber (or approximately 50 cents per pound)nationwide, handlers testified that a .5 to 1.5 cent assessment would notbe burdensome and would not represent a significant financial burden onhandler operations. Further, the benefits of reduced costs and increasedsales that would result from the contemplated research and promotion programsshould outweigh assessment costs. Handlers testified that the recordkeeping and reporting requirements thatmay be imposed under the proposed order would not be a burden on theirbusinesses because they already maintain the necessary types of records,or could easily compile them from current records used in the normal operationof their businesses. The reporting and recordkeeping requirements thatmay be established under the proposed order are likely to be comparableto those issued under similar marketing order programs, which are not consideredburdensome on handlers regulated under those orders. Therefore, the reportingand recordkeeping requirements would not be expected to impose any significantadditional costs on handlers. The terms of the proposed order should be administered in an efficientand economical manner in order to effectuate the declared policy of theAct. All entities, small and large, should be subject to minimal regulatoryrequirements as a result of the proposed order.In determining that the proposed order would not have a significant economicimpact on a substantial number of small entities, all of the issues discussedabove were considered. The order provisions have been carefully reviewedand every effort has been made to minimize any unnecessary costs or otherrequirements on handlers. Although the order may impose some additionalcosts and requirements on handlers, it is anticipated that the programunder the proposed order would help to increase demand for greenhouse cucumbers.Therefore, any additional costs should be offset by the benefits derivedfrom expanded markets and sales benefiting handlers and producers alike.Accordingly, it is determined that the provisions of the proposed orderwould not have a significant impact on small handlers or producers. In accordance with the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 [44 U.S.C. Chapter35], the reporting and recordkeeping provisions that may be imposed bythe proposed order would be submitted to the Office of Management and Budget(OMB) for review. They would not become effective prior to OMB approval.Any requirements imposed would be evaluated against potential benefitsto be derived, and any added burden resulting from increased reportingor recordkeeping would not be significant when compared to those anticipatedbenefits. Reporting and recordkeeping requirements issued under comparable marketingorder programs impose an average annual burden on each regulated handlerof about one hour. It is reasonable to expect that a comparable burdenmay be imposed under this proposed order on the estimated 250 handlersof greenhouse cucumbers. The Act requires that prior to the issuance of a marketing order, a referendumbe conducted of affected producers to determine whether they approve theorder. The ballot material that would be used in conducting any referendumon this proposed marketing order has been submitted to and approved byOMB (OMB No. 0581-0161). It has been estimated that it would take an averageof 10 minutes for each of the approximately 250 greenhouse cucumber producersto participate in a voluntary referendum balloting. Additionally, it hasbeen estimated that it would take approximately 5 minutes for each of the250 greenhouse cucumber handlers to complete the proposed marketing agreement.And finally, should the order be approved, it has been estimated that itwould take approximately 10 minutes for each of the 22 committee membernominees to complete a background statement to ascertain their eligibilityto serve on the Cucumber Administrative Committee. In accordance with Executive Order 12612, consideration has been givenas to whether the proposed order would have substantial direct effectson the 50 United States of America, on the relationship between the nationalgovernment and the States, or on the distribution of power and responsibilitiesamong the various levels of government. To this end, notice of the hearingconducted to consider the establishment of a Federal marketing order programfor greenhouse cucumbers grown in the United States was provided to allgovernors, as well as to the Mayor of the District of Columbia, and tothe Commissioners of Agriculture of all 50 States. No evidence was receivedindicating that the proposed order would create any burdens, financialor otherwise, on any of the States or the District of Columbia. Further,the proposed order would cover all greenhouse cucumbers grown in the U.S.Thus, any marketing orders, or their equivalent, authorized under Statestatutes could not achieve the same results as an alternative to a Federalmarketing order program. It is therefore determined that this proposedrule does not have sufficient federalism implications to warrant the preparationof a Federalism Assessment. Material Issues The material issues presented on the record of the hearing are as follows:1. Whether the handling of greenhouse cucumbers grown in the proposed productionarea is in the current of interstate or foreign commerce or directly burdens,obstructs, or affects such commerce; 2. Whether the economic and marketing conditions are such that they justifya need for a Federal marketing agreement and order which will tend to effectuatethe declared policy of the Act; 3. What the specific terms and provisions of the proposed order shouldbe including: (a) The definition of terms used therein which are necessary to attainthe objectives of the order and the Act; (b) The establishment, composition, maintenance, powers and duties of acommittee which shall be the administrative agency for assisting the Secretaryin the administration of the marketing order; (c) The authority to incur expenses and the procedure to levy assessmentson handlers to obtain revenue for paying such expenses; (d) The authority to establish, or provide for the establishment of, productionand marketing research and market development projects; (e) The method of regulating the handling of greenhouse cucumbers grownin the production area; (f) The authority for inspection and certification of shipments; (g) The establishment of requirements for handler reporting and recordkeeping;(h) The requirement of compliance with all provisions of the proposed orderand with regulations issued under it; and (i) Additional terms and conditions as set forth in andSection;andSection;968.82 through 968.91 of the Notice of Hearing published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of June 27, 1988 [53 FR 24070] which are commonto all marketing agreements and marketing orders, and other terms and conditionspublished as andSection;andSection; 968.97 through 968.99 which are commonto marketing agreements only. Findings and Conclusions The following findings and conclusions on the material issues are basedon the record of the hearing. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. The Handling of Greenhouse Cucumbers is in the Current of Interstateor Foreign Commerce or Directly Burdens, Obstructs or Affects Such Commerce</ITAG>The record evidence indicates that approximately 38 million pounds of greenhousecucumbers were produced in the United States in 1987-88. These cucumbers,which are grown in greenhouses, are known to be commercially produced inat least 30 States. California, Florida and Ohio are the top three greenhousecucumber producing States, with about 77 percent of the total nationalproduction. The remaining 23 percent is grown in geographic locations dispersedthroughout the country, mostly near major population centers. Because thesecucumbers are grown in greenhouses, they can be grown in any of the 50States and in the District of Columbia. The record indicates that greenhouse cucumbers are marketed not only withinthe State where grown, but also outside that State. Greenhouse cucumbershipments frequently move from one State to another, and sometimes aretransported across the entire United States. For example, witnesses representinghandlers from California, Ohio and Florida all indicated that they soldgreenhouse cucumbers in the New York City market. Additionally, a Coloradohandler testified that he shipped greenhouse cucumbers to markets in California,Texas and Illinois. A small volume of greenhouse cucumbers is exportedto eastern and western Canada during Canada's low production periods. Testimony indicates that although greenhouse cucumbers are produced twelvemonths of the year, production levels vary from month to month, dependingon the geographic location of the greenhouse, climate, and anticipatedavailability of competing commodities. Almost all shipments are destinedfor fresh market sales and few, if any, are intended for processing. Greenhousecucumbers are transported primarily by truck to local markets and to majorcities across the United States. Air transport is seldom used, due primarilyto cost considerations. The record evidence indicates that greenhouse cucumberslose their identity once they leave their point of origin, and in the marketplaceconsumers cannot distinguish between a greenhouse cucumber produced inone area and one produced in another area. Witnessed testified that greenhouse cucumbers are imported primarily fromCanada, although imported supplies are also available from the Netherlands,Spain, Honduras, Colombia, Costa Rica, the Canary Islands and Mexico. Theseimported greenhouse cucumbers compete directly in the same markets withavailable domestic supplies.Testimony indicates that when low prices are received in one market, pricesand sales at other markets throughout the U.S. are affected. This is particularlynoticeable when one seller offers fruit at less than the prevailing marketprices. When this occurs, the effect may be to depress market prices elsewhere.Witnesses indicated that, in general, price changes are known by most buyers,and often immediately affect prices in other markets, which is indicativeof the very competitive wholesale market for greenhouse cucumbers. The record evidence shows that the handling of greenhouse cucumbers inany one market exerts an influence on the handling of such greenhouse cucumbersin all other markets. As with other commodities, sellers of greenhousecucumbers conduct their businesses so as to obtain maximum returns forthe product they have for sale. Shippers and other sellers such as brokers,commission agents, and wholesalers therefore continually survey all accessiblemarkets so that they may take advantage of the best possible prices available.Further, they constantly attempt to develop demand and seek new marketsfor their product, and all markets provide an opportunity for individualsellers to increase sales. Likewise, greenhouse cucumber buyers considerprices and availability of greenhouse cucumbers from all sources in makingtheir purchasing decisions. For this reason, greenhouse cucumber suppliesand prices in any one location are promptly known elsewhere and have adirect effect on supplies and prices in all other locations. Therefore, it is hereby found that all handling of greenhouse cucumbersgrown in the production area is in the current of interstate or foreigncommerce or directly burdens, obstructs, or affects such commerce. Hence,all handling of greenhouse cucumbers grown in the production area shouldbe covered by the proposed order. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Economic and Marketing Conditions Justify a Need for a FederalMarketing Order </ITAG>The record indicates that greenhouse cucumbers originated in Holland wherethey are grown and consumed extensively. Witnesses testified that the seedlessEuropean cucumber was brought to the North American continent after WorldWar II by Dutch immigrants. A large majority of these immigrants settledin the Canadian provinces of Ontario, Alberta, and British Columbia. TheCanadian government imported specialists from England and Holland to assistits own greenhouse vegetable growers in the culture of greenhouse cucumbers.Testimony indicates that commercial production of greenhouse cucumbersin the United States began more than 40 years ago, in northern States suchas Ohio. Commercial production of greenhouse cucumbers in California, nowthe leading domestic producing State, began in the late 1960's. Historicproduction and price information is limited, since no known private orpublic entity in the U.S. collected such data in the past. However, witnessesindicated that production of and prices for greenhouse cucumbers rose steadilyfrom about 1975 to 1986. Acreage and production increased about l0 percentin 1986-87, but declined slightly in 1987-88. ln 1987-88, the three major producing States were California, Florida,and Ohio. There were about 40 acres of greenhouse cucumbers in California,35 acres in Florida and 20 acres in Ohio. These States combined represented95 acres of an approximate U.S. total of 120 acres. Thus, these three Statesaccounted for about 80 percent of the national total acreage. While productionis currently concentrated in three States, there are greenhouse cucumberproducers dispersed throughout the country. These growers are presentlylocated in at least 30 different States including Alaska and Hawaii. Total U.S. greenhouse cucumber production in 1987-88 was estimated to beabout 38 million pounds. California produced approximately 33 percent ofthe total volume, followed by Florida with 27 percent and Ohio with 17percent. The record indicates that acreage and production in these Statesis expected to remain relatively stable in the near future. Witnesses testifiedthat future growth will likely be greatest in other eastern, southern andwestern locations in the United States. The areas with the most growthpotential are those located closer to certain major population centersthan current production areas in California, Ohio, and Florida, which nowserve these markets. Witnesses projected different rates of future growth in greenhouse cucumberproduction. One witness, for example, estimated that 1988-89 productionwould be up about 15 percent from the previous year. Over the long term,the consensus is that the growth rate is likely to be at least 10 percenta year. However, witnesses indicated that the actual rate of growth isheavily dependent upon the industry's ability to expand current marketsand find new ones. An organized marketing research and promotion program,conducted under the proposed order, would be instrumental in accomplishingthis objective. Testimony indicates that the seedless European cucumber is unique fromother cucumbers in that it cannot be grown outdoors. Greenhouse cucumbersproduce fruit without pollination and therefore are seedless. If pollinationoccurred, the resulting fruit would have seeds. Also, the fruit would swelland become gourd-like, rather than long and narrow, and would be unmarketable.Greenhouse cucumbers are grown indoors to prevent bees from spreading pollen.In addition, a greenhouse environment is necessary because the undersideof the leaves, stems and suckers of the greenhouse cucumber plant havemillions of needle sharp ``prongs.'' The record indicates that even a mildbreeze would cause these prongs to scar the fruit and reduce its marketability.According to record evidence, most of the greenhouse cucumber varietiescurrently grown in the U.S. are hybrids produced by seed companies in Holland.They vary somewhat in vigor, disease resistance, fruit size, and otherfruit characteristics, such as color, ribbiness and neck length. Althoughmany tested varieties produce good yields and fruit quality, most growerstend to favor one of five varieties: Sandra, Toska 70, Farabio, Daleva,and Corona. All of these hybrids are resistant to some diseases such asleaf spot and downy mildew, but lack resistance to powdery mildew and toviruses such as cucumber mosaic, watermelon mosaic, and beet pseudo yellows.Under optimum conditions, fruit production begins 60 to 70 days after seeding.Daytime temperatures of 70 to 80 degrees Fahrenheit (F) are desirable.While higher temperatures are tolerable, prolonged periods of high temperaturesadversely affect fruit quality. Nighttime temperatures no lower than 65degrees F allow a rapid growth rate and earliest fruit production. Savingsin fuel costs may be significant at lower temperatures, but the growthrate would be slower and harvest would be delayed. The record indicates that greenhouse cucumbers should be harvested afterthey have reached a uniform diameter and before any yellowing appears atthe blossom end. If fruit is left on the plant after it has reached marketablesize, development of younger fruit is retarded. Greenhouse cucumbers aretypically harvested every one to three days. According to the record, since it typically takes two months after seedingfor a greenhouse cucumber plant to produce fruit, and harvest takes placeover a 10 to 12 week period, more than one crop can be planted in a year.Most greenhouse cucumber growers plant two or three crops per year, althoughsome plant a single greenhouse cucumber crop in rotation with other vegetablecrops. The record indicates that after harvest, the thin-skinned fruit is highlysusceptible to softening due to moisture loss. Therefore, growers typicallywrap greenhouse cucumbers individually in shrink-wrap film as soon as possibleafter harvest to maintain quality. The wrapped fruit is then packed incartons and stored at a temperature of about 55 degrees with a relativehumidity of 80 to 90 percent. Storage at lower temperatures results inchilling injury, which reduces quality and shelf life. Record evidence indicates that yields vary considerably among greenhousecucumber growers. Actual yields depend upon numerous variables, includingthe length of the harvest period, plant spacing, pruning practices, availablelight, prevailing temperatures, variety, and nutrition and pest management.One producer witness estimated yields to average between seven and ninepounds of fruit per square foot per year if production is continued a full12 months (i.e., if three crops were planted). This would produce about300,000 to 400,000 pounds per acre per year. A second producer estimatedyields to range between eight and 10 pounds per square foot, and anotherproducer reported yields of nine pounds per square foot. Testimony indicates that the cost of producing greenhouse cucumbers differsbetween States as well as within each State. One witness indicated thattotal production costs range from $.35 to $.60 per pound (or $5.60 to $9.60per 16-pound carton) depending on the time of year, age and location ofthe greenhouse, climate, yield and cultural practices. One grower witness indicated that the cash cost (which excludes intereston investment, depreciation and operator's wage allowance) of producingone carton of greenhouse cucumbers was about $6.90 in 1986-87, up from$6.60 the previous year. Costs have increased steadily since 1970-71, whenit cost about $3.20 to produce a carton of greenhouse cucumbers. Laboris consistently the highest cost component, averaging about 33 percentof the total in recent years. Another major expense is the cost of heatingthe greenhouse, which accounts for 20 to 25 percent of total cash costs.The record indicates that per carton production costs are generally highestin the winter, because yields are lower due to less daylight and heatingcosts are incurred. For example, it was testified that the total cost ofproduction for one winter crop in California per 1,000 square feet of greenhousein 1986-87 was $1,716. At an average yield of three pounds per square footfor the winter crop, the cost of production per carton was about $9.30.In general, costs can be expected to be even higher in northern growingStates. The record indicates that currently there is little research being donein the U.S. on producing greenhouse vegetables. While some limited researchhas been conducted on pest control with chemical company grants, othercultural research has not been done due to lack of funds. In contrast,large sums of money are spent each year in other countries such as Hollandand Canada on marketing and production research for greenhouse vegetables.Although some of the research results become available to U.S. growers,not all of the information is immediately available to U.S. growers oris applicable to growing conditions in the U.S. Witnesses testified thatcertain viruses that can seriously affect greenhouse cucumber productionare unique to the United States such as cucumber mosaic, watermelon mosaic,and beet pseudo yellows virus. No variety of greenhouse cucumber is currentlyavailable that is resistant to any of these diseases to any great extent.Currently, almost all seed used to produce greenhouse cucumbers in theU.S. are acquired from seed-producing companies in Holland because theDutch have ownership rights to the parent plants from which the seeds originate.Testimony indicates that greenhouses are not pest-free and that the greenhouseenvironment is attractive to pests such as the white fly, vegetable leafminer, and cabbage looper. These pests gain entrance into greenhouses inmany ways including through vents, fan housings, open doorways and on clothesand equipment. Testimony indicated that much research is needed on theissue of pest control. In addition, production research to develop domesticseed sources and to address the unique problems facing U.S. growers wouldhelp to reduce production costs and increase productivity. As previously indicated, the cost of producing greenhouse cucumbers hasincreased steadily since 1970-71. According to record evidence, at thesame time that costs are increasing, prices received for greenhouse cucumbersare declining. The record indicates that f.o.b. prices averaged about $9per carton in 1983-84 and $8 per carton in 1984-85 and 1985-86. The differencebetween the highest and lowest prices received in 1985-86 was $14.37 percarton with prices ranging from $5.97 to $20.34 per carton. Record evidenceshows that prices received can be less than production costs. Prices aretypically at their lowest levels during the spring and early summer, whenboth greenhouse and field-grown cucumber supplies are at peak levels. Ingeneral, prices received during the winter months, when the volume of shipmentsis low, are higher.Proponents testified that the annual per capita consumption of greenhousecucumbers in the U.S. is about .16 pounds, which is significantly belowthe annual per capita consumption of other salad vegetables such as tomatoes(17 pounds). It is also far less than the annual per capita consumptionof greenhouse cucumbers in Canada, which is estimated at 2.4 pounds. Witnessesattributed this difference in large part to Canada's established promotionprograms for greenhouse cucumbers. Canada produces about 62 million poundsof greenhouse cucumbers annually, substantially more than is produced inthe U.S. Almost all Canadian production is in the three provinces of Ontario,British Columbia and Alberta. Growers in these provinces assess themselves$.19, $.31 and $.03 per box, respectively, to finance promotion programs.A variety of activities have been undertaken, most of them designed toinform the consumer of the product. These activities include providingpoint-of-purchase materials to retailers, supplying camera-ready art workto magazines and newspapers, attending trade shows, obtaining free promotionalspace in trade magazines, producing promotional video spots, and conductingin-store demonstrations. Recipes, point-of-sale posters, price cards andbanners are also provided to participating retailers. The record indicatesthat these types of promotion activities have resulted in substantial increasesin weekly sales in many Canadian markets. The record indicates that as a result of these promotion programs, Canadianconsumers are far more familiar with greenhouse cucumbers than consumersin the U.S. and purchase them much more frequently. Witnesses testifiedthat a major problem facing the U.S. greenhouse cucumber industry is thatmost U.S. consumers do not know that greenhouse cucumbers exist, and therefore,what they taste like. Also, many are unaware of the unique characteristicsof greenhouse cucumbers, such as being burpless. The record indicates thatin consumer surveys conducted in the United States for the industry overthe last five years, less than ten percent of those polled had ever eatena greenhouse cucumber or even knew of them. Those that were aware of greenhousecucumbers did not know of the differences between them and field-growncucumbers other than the higher retail price, larger size and that theyare wrapped in cellophane. Witnesses testified that once a consumer triesa greenhouse cucumber, there is a very good chance that consumer will makerepeat purchases. Therefore, the record indicates that the industry needsto establish a promotion program to educate consumers and encourage themto try greenhouse cucumbers. Such a program would benefit producers andhandlers. Testimony further indicates that the industry needs to better inform producemanagers of ways to merchandise and handle greenhouse cucumbers. Due tothe limited consumer demand, many produce managers are not inclined topromote greenhouse cucumbers. In addition, many produce managers themselvesmay not be aware of the differences between greenhouse and field-growncucumbers. Further, many are unfamiliar with the proper way to handle andstore the product. Testimony indicates that there needs to be an industrywide program to educate consumers and produce managers alike, and thata marketing order would provide the necessary means to develop such a program.Witnesses also testified that market research, in the form of data collectionand analysis, would be an essential part of the overall marketing and promotionstrategy. Currently, limited data is gathered with respect to greenhousecucumbers. To effectively promote and market greenhouse cucumbers, proponentstestified that additional knowledge of supplies and market conditions andmore complete data is necessary to make prudent decisions for focusingpromotional efforts and promoting the efficient allocation of resources.The record further indicates that market research could be used to determinethe specific type of product consumers prefer and to what extent this productis demanded in different markets. Such information would facilitate efficientdistribution which in turn would lower the costs of marketing greenhousecucumbers to the benefit of growers, handlers and consumers. Accordingly, the record supports the need for provisions in the proposedmarketing order for production research and marketing research and developmentactivities to assist, improve or promote the production, marketing, distributionand consumption of greenhouse cucumbers. Record evidence indicates that in September 1985, at the request of theindustry, the USDA revised the U.S. Standards for Grades of GreenhouseCucumbers, which appear at 7 CFR Part 51 at sections 51.3855 to 51.3863.These Standards define three grades of greenhouse cucumbers: U.S. Fancy,U.S. No. 1, and U.S. No. 2. One major difference in the requirements foreach of the grades relates to the shape of the greenhouse cucumber. Themost desirable and highest grade greenhouse cucumbers are fairly straightand only slightly tapered at either end. Other grade requirements pertainto color and allowable defects such as bruises and scars. The use of theU.S. Grade Standards is voluntary.The record indicates that most greenhouse cucumber handlers do not havetheir product graded in accordance with the U.S. Standards. Rather thanusing the three grades that are specifically defined in the Standards todenote quality, shippers customarily refer to greenhouse cucumbers as beingFancy, Commercial or Salad grade. As generally used, these terms are comparableto the U.S. grades (i.e., a Commercial grade greenhouse cucumber is roughlyequivalent to a U.S. No. 2 grade greenhouse cucumber). However, since theseterms have not been specifically defined, their use in describing qualityis not uniform among handlers. Testimony indicates that what some handlerspack as Fancy fruit, others would consider to be Commercial, and vice versa.Due to the inconsistent application of these terms in marketing greenhousecucumbers, buyers have no assurance of the quality of the product theyare purchasing. When a load of ``Fancy'' greenhouse cucumbers are receivedthat do not meet a buyer's expectations, future sales to that buyer maybe jeopardized. Also, if one shipper chooses to label what is commonlyregarded as Commercial grade fruit as Fancy, other shippers of Fancy greenhousecucumbers would be hurt if this lesser quality offered as top grade fruitresulted in reduced prices. The record indicates that this problem couldbe resolved under the proposed order by establishing requirements thatuniform standards be applied in the labelling of greenhouse cucumbers forshipment to fresh market. Such uniformity could reduce confusion and promoteorderly and efficient marketing of the product. The record further indicates that the packaging of greenhouse cucumbersis not uniform and causes confusion among wholesale buyers. In Californiaand other parts of the western U.S., the most commonly used box to packgreenhouse cucumbers has dimensions of 4\1/2\ inches andmultiply; 13\1/2\inches andmultiply; 16\1/2\ inches, and generally has a net weight of about16 pounds. This single box is used to pack all sizes of fruit, with a typicalpack containing 12, 14, 16 or 18 greenhouse cucumbers. When packing thisway, the count is used to denote size. In Ohio, two box sizes are most commonly used to pack greenhouse cucumbers,each of which differs in size from the single box used in the western U.S.One box, with dimensions of 4\3/4\ inches andmultiply; 11 inches andmultiply;16 inches is used to pack Small greenhouse cucumbers (11 to 12 inches inlength) and Medium greenhouse cucumbers (12 to 14 inches). The other box(4\3/4\andmin16;andmin16;andmultiply;11andmin16;andmin16;andmultiply;19andmin16;andmin16;)is used to pack Large (14 to 16 inches) and Extra Large (16 inches andlonger) greenhouse cucumbers. In Florida and other southeastern States, four different boxes are mostcommonly used which separate Small, Medium, Large, and Extra Large greenhousecucumbers. In these States, greenhouse cucumbers are generally packed 12to a carton. The size of the fruit is indicated by the terms Small, Medium,Large, and Extra Large, which is comparable to the customary practice inthe Ohio area. According to record evidence, while there are seven different boxes mostcommonly used by greenhouse cucumber shippers, there are an undeterminednumber of other containers also being used to pack greenhouse cucumbers.Further, the arrangement of the fruit in the box is not uniform. Greenhousecucumbers may be packed lengthwise or crosswise or, in some cases, a combinationof the two. Additionally, there are no requirements that a box containgreenhouse cucumbers of a uniform size, and at times various sizes arepacked in a single box. Some producers and handlers are very discriminatingabout the specific arrangement and sizes they pack. They select and arrangethe pack of greenhouse cucumbers to produce a box whose contents are uniformand attractive and do not rattle. Other packers are far less particular,and pack with little regard to uniformity. Typically, a broker never personallysees or inspects the greenhouse cucumbers that have been purchased forvarious accounts. Therefore, a buyer that has been receiving boxes containing12 greenhouse cucumbers may suddenly find himself or herself with a certainlot of greenhouse cucumbers that are packed 18 or 16 per container. Sincethere are no specific requirements, greenhouse cucumbers are sometimessold below, or above, the prevailing market price level because of thedifferent counts in the various containers. Witnesses testified that theproposed order could benefit the industry by ensuring uniformity throughstandardization. Testimony indicates that the multiplicity of containers used in packinggreenhouse cucumbers causes confusion in the marketing of the product.The proliferation of container types and sizes also creates inventory problemsfor purchasers, and often makes the palletization of containers difficult.Handlers frequently encounter difficulty palletizing a variety of containersizes on the same pallet. The record indicates that the industry needsto develop more uniformity in the container sizes that are used by allgreenhouse cucumber handlers, and recognized by receivers and distributors.This would provide for more efficient handling of the product. Taken together, the lack of standardization and uniformity in packing greenhousecucumbers tends to undermine trade confidence. According to the record,specifications of the size, capacity, dimensions, markings, and pack ofthe containers that may be used in marketing greenhouse cucumbers wouldprovide a means of maintaining trade confidence, establishing orderly marketing,and improving returns to producers. The record indicates that in addition to regulations which have as theirobjective standardizing the pack of greenhouse cucumbers, there is a needto establish minimum standards of size and quality. Several witnesses testifiedthat buyers are often unwilling to pay prices appropriate for good qualitygreenhouse cucumbers and to increase purchases because they have previouslyreceived low quality product. The evidence of record indicates that consumerswho purchase greenhouse cucumbers in supermarkets and chain stores, aswell as food service and restaurant trade buyers, generally demand reliablesupplies of a high quality product. In response, the wholesale trade isdemanding a supply of good quality greenhouse cucumbers with standardizedcharacteristics as a condition of future sales.Therefore, in order to maintain and expand the market for greenhouse cucumbers,authority should be provided to the committee to recommend regulationswith respect to grade, size and quality requirements which will promoteorderly marketing conditions as will be in the public interest. The testimonyis that while there may be a market for some low quality greenhouse cucumbers,the presence of that product in the marketplace, except in certain designatedoutlets (e.g., farmers' markets and flea markets), generally contributesto disorderly marketing conditions because it lowers the price receivedfor all greenhouse cucumbers and discourages increased consumer acceptanceand purchase of the product. Moreover, prices received for those greenhousecucumbers are substantially less than those received for the higher qualityproduct. Thus, it is unlikely that most producers could sustain their businessesif a large portion of their returns were derived from the sale of low qualitygreenhouse cucumbers. Authorizing grade, size and quality regulations wouldtend to effectuate the declared policy of the Act and would be in the interestof both producers and consumers, as well as be in the public interest.Exercise of the authority to regulate the quality of fresh market shipmentsand to establish uniform containers could assure the availability of goodquality fruit, strengthen demand, and expand markets for greenhouse cucumbers.Growers would benefit from increased returns, and consumers would benefitby having additional supplies of acceptable quality product available inthe marketplace. In view of the foregoing, it is concluded that there is a need for a marketingorder for greenhouse cucumbers grown in the United States, including theDistrict of Columbia. The proposed order would meet the needs of the industryand would tend to effectuate the declared policy of the Act. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Specific Terms and Provisions of the Proposed Order </ITAG>(a) Certain terms should be defined in the order for the purpose of designatingspecifically their applicability and limitations whenever they are used.The definition of terms discussed below is necessary to attain the objectivesof the order and the Act. ``Secretary'' should be defined to mean the Secretary of Agriculture ofthe United States, or any other officer or employee of the United StatesDepartment of Agriculture who has been or who may be delegated the authorityto act for the Secretary. ``Act'' should be defined to provide the correct statutory citation forthe Agricultural Marketing Agreement Act of 1937, as amended. This is thestatute under which the proposed regulatory program would be operative,and this definition avoids the need to refer to the citation throughoutthe order. ``Person'' should be defined to mean an individual, partnership, corporation,association, or any other business unit. This definition is the same asthat contained in the Act and insures that it has the same meaning in theorder as it has in the Act. The term ``production area'' should be defined in the order to delineatethe area in which greenhouse cucumbers must be grown before the handlingthereof is subject to the provisions of the order. Such term should bedefined to include all fifty States of the United States of America andthe District of Columbia. The record evidence indicates that greenhouse cucumbers are known to becurrently commercially produced in at least 30 States. They can be grownin any part of the country since they are grown in greenhouses, which maybe constructed anywhere. While there are some differences in productionpractices among the various geographical locations due to climate and otherfactors, greenhouse cucumbers grown in any given area cannot be readilydistinguished from those grown in another area. The record indicates thatgreenhouse cucumbers from all areas compete in the same markets, and buyersdo not make a distinction among greenhouse cucumbers based upon where theywere grown. Moreover, greenhouse cucumbers from all locations are commingledon the retail shelf, and consumers do not buy greenhouse cucumbers fromone region to the exclusion of those grown in another area. Thus, the marketingof greenhouse cucumbers from one area directly affects the marketing ofgreenhouse cucumbers grown in another area. A primary objective of the proposed order is to establish standardizedrequirements to provide a uniform basis for trading greenhouse cucumbers.Establishing separate regional marketing orders applicable to differentparts of the country would prevent attainment of this objective. Further,witnesses testified that any one region is insufficiently large to individuallyfinance the types of research and promotion projects needed by the industry.For example, in California, the largest producing State, there are onlyabout 30 greenhouse cucumber growers and production totals about one million16-pound cartons. Witnesses indicated that this base is insufficient tosupport a marketing order program of the type needed. Production research,and market research and development projects contemplated under the proposedorder would benefit all U.S. producers. Accordingly, it is reasonable and necessary for all production to be coveredby the proposed order. Further, the issuance of several marketing ordersapplicable to regional production areas would not effectively carry outthe declared policy of the Act. It is therefore concluded that the production area as defined in the orderconstitutes the smallest geographic area to which the order may be applied,consistent with carrying out the declared policy of the Act. The term ``cucumbers'' should be defined to specify the commodity coveredby the proposed order and to which the terms and provisions of the orderwould be applicable. The record indicates that ``cucumbers'' should bedefined to mean predominately gynoecious cultivars of Cucumis sativus L.,commonly known as seedless European cucumbers, greenhouse cucumbers, Europeancucumbers, English cucumbers, hothouse seedless cucumbers, or greenhouseseedless cucumbers, that are grown by producers in greenhouses in the productionarea. These greenhouse cucumbers are readily distinguishable from field-growncucumbers, and the term has a specific meaning to all producers and handlers.The proposed order has been revised to specify that the cucumbers are tobe grown by producers in greenhouses in the production area. A definition of the term ``varieties'' should be included in the orderto mean and include all classifications or subdivisions of greenhouse cucumbers.The definition would allow for authority for different regulations fordifferent varieties of greenhouse cucumbers in the event such differentregulations are deemed appropriate. The term ``producer'' should be synonymous with ``grower'' and should bedefined in the proposed order to identify those persons who are eligibleto vote for, and serve as, producer members or alternates on the committeeand to vote in any referendum. The term should mean any person engagedin a proprietary capacity in the production of greenhouse cucumbers forfresh market within the production area.The record indicates that the term ``producer'' should not include personswho grow greenhouse cucumbers in an area of 2,500 square feet or less ofclimate-controlled, weather-protected growing area devoted to greenhousecucumber production. Record evidence indicates that producers growing greenhousecucumbers on such a small scale can be considered ``hobbyists''. Testimonyindicates that the industry believes this level of production representsa fair distinction between commercial producers and ``hobbyists'', particularlysince the average size of a commercial greenhouse cucumber operation is17,000 to 20,000 square feet. The record indicates that ``hobbyists'' wouldnot be eligible to vote for or serve as committee members or vote in referenda.Testimony was presented that their interests differ considerably from thoseof commercial growers. Most of those persons who grow greenhouse cucumberson such a small scale typically do not sell their product in commercialmarkets. Rather, they grow greenhouse cucumbers primarily for their ownpersonal consumption, and perhaps for their neighbors as well. As such,these greenhouse cucumbers would be exempt from the handling requirementsthat may be imposed under the order. The proposed definition of cucumbershas been revised accordingly to specify that the term cucumbers appliesonly to cucumbers grown by producers, as defined in the proposed order.Each business unit (such as a corporation or partnership) should be considereda single producer and should have a single vote in nomination proceedingsand referenda. The term ``producer'' should include any person who ownsor shares in the ownership of greenhouse cucumbers. The term ``handler'' is synonymous with ``shipper'' and should be definedto identify the persons who would be subject to regulation under the proposedorder. Such term should apply to any person, except a common or contractcarrier transporting greenhouse cucumbers owned by another person, whoperforms any of the activities within the scope of the term ``handle'',as hereinafter defined. The definition identifies persons who would beresponsible for meeting the requirements of the order, including payingassessments, complying with any grade, size, pack, quality, and inspectionrequirements, and submitting reports. The record indicates that the greenhouse cucumber industry is unique inthat many producers also handle their own production. These persons shouldalso be considered handlers when performing handling activities as definedin the order. Common or contract carriers transporting greenhouse cucumbers which areowned by another person should not be considered as handlers, even thoughthey transport greenhouse cucumbers, because such carriers do not havecontrol over the product being transported. Nor are they the persons whocause the introduction of such greenhouse cucumbers into the channels ofcommerce. The only interest of common or contract carriers in greenhousecucumbers is to transport them for a service charge to destinations determinedby others. The term ``handle'' should be defined to identify those activities whichwould make a person a handler, and thereby subject to regulation underthe marketing order. Except as exempted, such activities should includeall phases of selling and transporting greenhouse cucumbers which placethem in the channels of commerce. The handling of greenhouse cucumberscan begin with the movement of such cucumbers from the greenhouse wheregrown and continue until they reach their final destination. The performanceof one or more activity such as selling, consigning, delivering or transportingby any person, either directly or through others, should constitute handling.``Handle'' and ``ship'' are used synonymously and the definition shouldso indicate. The record indicates that greenhouse cucumbers move to market in severalways. Most growers perform the initial activities which constitute preparinggreenhouse cucumbers for market. Subsequent to harvest, these growers cleanthe fruit, wrap it, sort it by grade, size and other market factors, andpack it in containers. These activities should be included as handlingfunctions, and the person who performs them should be considered a handlersince that person would be responsible for the size and quality packedas well as the type of container in which the greenhouse cucumbers areplaced. Some growers sell their product directly to wholesalers or retailers, whichis clearly an activity that should be included in the definition of handle.In other cases, a broker is paid a fee or commission to act as an agentin arranging for the sale of the greenhouse cucumbers. A person who retainsa broker to act as that person's sales agent should be considered to beperforming a handling function. The record indicates that a number of growers utilize a marketing organizationto arrange for the transportation and sale of their greenhouse cucumbers.Customarily, these growers deliver their product to a central facilityoperated by the marketing organization for assembly into full loads priorto sale and shipment. The delivery of packed fruit to such a location shouldbe considered to be handling. With the exception of the process specifically excluded from the term ``handle'',all activities performed after a greenhouse cucumber is harvested and untilit is offered for sale at retail, should be included as a handling function.The record indicates that a specific exception to the term ``handle'' shouldbe the movement of greenhouse cucumbers from the greenhouse where grownto a handler facility in the production area for preparation for market.Testimony indicates that while most growers sort and pack their fruit,others deliver their greenhouse cucumbers in bulk to a handler facilityfor such preparation for market. In this case; the greenhouse cucumbersare not being transported to market for immediate consumption, nor arethey in the appropriate form for commercial sale since they have not yetbeen sorted or packed. This exemption should be provided subject to suchrules and regulations as the committee may prescribe, with the approvalof the Secretary. The proposed order has been revised to reflect this proviso.The record indicates that since the production area includes the entireUnited States, for compliance purposes it may be necessary to prescribethe specific circumstances under which such movement must occur beforeit would be considered to be exempt from the term ``handle''. The term ``committee'' should be defined to mean the administrative agencyknown as the Cucumber Administrative Committee established under the provisionsof the marketing order. Such a committee is authorized by the Act, andthis definition is merely to avoid the necessity of repeating the fullname of the committee each time a reference to it is made.The term ``fiscal period'' should be synonymous with ``fiscal year'' andshould be defined to mean the annual period for which the committee wouldplan the use of its funds. This period should be defined to mean the twelvemonth period beginning January 1 and ending December 31. Since cucumbersare shipped year-round and some handlers keep records on a calendar yearbasis, this period is reasonable. However, if necessary to improve thecommittee's management or for other reasons based on experience once theorder is established, it may be desirable to establish a fiscal periodother than one ending on December 31. Thus, authority should be includedin the order to provide for the establishment of a different fiscal periodif recommended by the committee and approved by the Secretary. It shouldbe recognized that if at some future date there is a change in the fiscalperiod, such change would result in a transition period being more or lessthan 12 months. Additionally, the initial fiscal year should commence onthe date the order becomes effective and should continue through the followingDecember 31. The term ``district'' should be defined as set forth in the order to providea basis for the nomination and selection of committee members. The recordindicates that the establishment of four districts would be appropriateand would assure adequate regional representation of producers on the committee.District l should be comprised of the western part of the country and shouldinclude the States of Alaska, Arizona, California, Hawaii, Idaho, Nevada,Oregon, Utah, and Washington. District 2 should be defined to include theStates of Colorado, Kansas, Montana, Nebraska, New Mexico, North Dakota,Oklahoma, South Dakota, Texas, and Wyoming. District 3 should encompassthe States of Connecticut, Delaware, Illinois, Indiana, Iowa, Maine, Massachusetts,Michigan, Minnesota, Missouri, New Hampshire, New Jersey, New York, Ohio,Pennsylvania, Rhode Island, Vermont, and Wisconsin. District 4 should comprisethe southeastern part of the country and should include the States of Alabama,Arkansas, Florida, Georgia, Kentucky, Louisiana, Maryland, Mississippi,North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, Virginia, and West Virginia,and the District of Columbia. These districts are the same as those proposedin the Notice of Hearing, with one exception. The notice proposed includingthe District of Columbia in District 3. However, since the surroundingStates of Virginia and Maryland are included in District 4, it would bemore appropriate to include the District of Columbia in that district.Section 968.12 of the proposed order has been revised accordingly. The record indicates that these four districts were established based onthe most recent data available on the distribution of greenhouse cucumberacreage and greenhouse cucumber production throughout the United States.However, the order should authorize the reestablishment of these districtsbased on committee recommendation with the approval of the Secretary toreflect future shifts in greenhouse cucumber production and other relevantfactors. ``Container'' should be defined to mean any receptacle used in the packagingor handling of greenhouse cucumbers. It would include any box, bag, crate,lug, basket, carton, or any other package. A definition of this term isneeded to serve as a basis for differentiation among the various receptaclesin which greenhouse cucumbers are shipped to the fresh market which couldbe used in conjunction with the proposed authority to regulate containers.The term ``pack'' should be defined to mean the specific arrangement, size,weight, count, or grade of greenhouse cucumbers in a particular type andsize of container, or combination of the above. Typical examples of packscurrently in use are 12-count, 14-count, 16-count and 18-count packs. Otherpacks include Small, Medium, Large and Extra Large. Packs are also identifiedby quality, such as U.S. No. 1, Fancy, Commercial or Salad grade. Often,packs of greenhouse cucumbers are identified by both size and quality (e.g.,a 14-count pack of Fancy grade). It is essential that this term be definedin the proposed order so that appropriate regulations may be tailored toparticular packs. The terms ``part'' and ``subpart'' should be defined in the order. ``Part''means the Order Regulating the Handling of Seedless European CucumbersGrown in the United States and all rules, regulations, and supplementaryorders issued thereunder. The Order shall be a ``subpart'' of such ``part.''(b) In accordance with the Act, a committee should be established to administerthe provisions of the order and to provide for effective and efficientoperation of the order. The Cucumber Administrative Committee should thereforebe established and consist of 11 members, including seven producer members,three handler members, and one public member. The record indicates thata committee composed of 11 members, with a like number of alternates, wouldprovide adequate representation and would provide for reasonable judgmentand deliberation with respect to recommendations made to the Secretary,and in the discharge of other committee duties. The record indicates that it is appropriate that a majority of the committeemembers be producers. Seven of the 11 committee members should thereforebe greenhouse cucumber producers. Since the program would be financed byhandlers, and handlers would be responsible for complying with the termsof the marketing order, however, it would be reasonable to provide forhandler representation on the committee as well. For this reason, proponentsproposed that three of the 11 members on the committee be handlers. The record indicates that producer membership should be allocated amongthe four established geographic districts to ensure adequate representationfrom all parts of the production area. Accordingly, two producer membersshould be selected from District 1, one producer member should be selectedfrom District 2, two producer members should be selected from District3, and two producer members should be selected from District 4. Testimony reveals that the division of the production area into districtsfor the purpose of producer representation on the committee, and the numberof producer members to be appointed from each district were given thoroughconsideration by proponents of the proposed order. In determining the numberof producer representatives from each of the districts, consideration wasgiven to the relative greenhouse cucumber production and acreage in eachof the districts. Thus, the number of grower members from each districtis related to that district's portion of the total greenhouse cucumberacreage in the production area. The record indicates that approximately38 percent of the current greenhouse cucumber acreage is located in District1, approximately seven percent in District 2, approximately 21 percentin District 3, and approximately 34 percent in District 4. Accordingly,of the seven producer members, two should represent District 1, one shouldrepresent District 2, two should represent District 3, and two should representDistrict 4.Each person selected to serve as a producer member or alternate shouldbe an individual who is a producer in the district that person is selectedto represent, or an officer or employee of a corporate producer or othertype of business unit engaged in producing greenhouse cucumbers in thatdistrict. Producer members and alternates should also be residents of thedistrict they are elected to represent. Such persons would be expectedto have a strong interest in the effects of committee decisions on greenhousecucumber producers. As a resident of the district a member represents,such person would be familiar with the problems and concerns of producersin that district. The record indicates that in order to provide for maximum participation,no single growing entity should be permitted to have more than one producermember seat on the committee. However, this restriction should not applyto alternate members. Therefore, a single grower should be able to haveboth a member and an alternate member seat on the committee. However, thesuggestion in proponents, brief that both grower and handler alternatesbe required to be from the same organization as the respective membersis not adopted because it would limit participation on the committee. The record indicates that since handlers typically market greenhouse cucumberson a national basis, there is no need to apportion handler membership amongthe districts. The three handler members should therefore be selected torepresent the production area at large. However, no more than two handlersshould be selected from any one district. This was supported by testimonyand proponents' brief. The proposed order has been revised accordingly.Additionally, a single handler entity should not be permitted to hold morethan one handler member position (not including alternate positions) onthe committee. Each person selected to serve as a handler member or alternate should bean individual who is a handler, or an officer or employee of a corporatehandler or other type of business unit, engaged in handling greenhousecucumbers grown in the production area. Handler members would thereforebe familiar with the supply and demand factors affecting the sale of greenhousecucumbers and the effect of regulation upon such sales. Record evidence supports public representation on the administrative committee.While the influence of consumers would be implicitly present in the deliberationsof the producer and handler committee members and all committee meetingswould be public, the appointment of a public member would offer many advantages.One would be the direct communication between industry members and thepublic member, who would have no connection with the industry and whoseopinions on regulatory standards would represent the general public. Anotherwould be to afford the industry an opportunity to discuss their problemsand concerns with someone who would view these problems and concerns fromoutside the greenhouse cucumber industry. The public representative and that person's alternate should not be permittedto have a direct financial interest in the production, processing, financing,buying, packing, or marketing of greenhouse cucumbers except as a consumer,nor be a director, officer, or employee of any firm so engaged. Such publicrepresentatives should be able to devote sufficient time and express awillingness to attend committee activities regularly and to familiarizethemselves with the background and economics of the industry. The provisionsof the proposed order, as set forth in the Notice of Hearing, specifiedno qualifications for the public member. Section 968.20 of the proposedorder has been revised to include such qualifications, reflecting the recordevidence. Each member of the committee, including the public member, should havean alternate. This would ensure that all segments of the industry and allportions of the production area are adequately represented in the conductof the committee's business and that the continuity of operation is notinterrupted. The order should provide that alternate members should meetthe same qualifications for membership as their respective members. Theywould act in the place and stead of their respective members during temporaryabsences. Additionally, in the event of the death, removal, resignationor disqualification of a member, the alternate should serve as member untila new member is nominated and selected. Also, since an alternate may bemore familiar with a particular issue before the committee than the alternate'srespective member, the proposed order should provide that a member maydesignate that member's alternate to serve as member at such meeting notwithstandingthe presence of the member. If both the member and alternate for a particular committee position areabsent from a meeting, the member, the alternate, or the committee, inthat order, should be empowered to designate another alternate from thesame group (i.e., producer or handler) and district (in the case of producerrepresentatives) to act in the place of the absent member. Only the alternatepublic member should be able to serve in the absence of the public member,however. This procedure would further insure the proper and efficient operationof the committee. With the exception of initial members, the term of office of committeemembers and their respective alternates should be for three years and shouldbegin on January 1 and end on December 31, or for such other three-yearperiod as the committee may recommend and the Secretary approve. The recordindicates that a three-year term is appropriate because it would give memberssufficient time to become familiar with committee operations and enablethem to make meaningful contributions at committee meetings. The effective date of the order, if issued, may not coincide with the specifiedbeginning date of the terms of office of committee members and alternates.Therefore, a provision is necessary to adjust the initial terms of office.To accomplish this, the order should provide that the terms of office ofthe initial members and alternates shall begin as soon as possible afterthe effective date of the order. In the event that the initial members are selected prior to January 1,1990, the initial one-year term would not end on December 31, 1989, butwould continue until December 31, 1990. Similarly, the two-, and three-yearterms would end on December 31, 1991, and 1992, respectively. If thesemembers were selected after December 31, 1990, that remaining portion ofthe calendar year would not be considered the initial one-year terms andsimilarly for the first year of the two-year or three-year terms. For thepurposes of applying the tenure requirements of the proposed order, eachof these initial terms would be considered as a one-, two-, or three-yearterm even though the actual period of the appointment may be several monthslonger or shorter, as the case may be. While it is important to provide a constant infusion of new members tothe committee, it is equally important to provide continuity and experience.For these reasons the terms of office should be staggered, with about one-thirdof the membership to be nominated and selected each year. To begin thisprocess, about one-third of the initial members shall serve one-year terms;about one-third of the initial members shall serve two-year terms; andabout one-third of the initial members shall serve three-year terms. Thus,eight of the 11 initial committee members nominated would be appointedfor shortened terms. Each subsequent year, about one-third of the positionson the committee would be filled. The record indicates that it would be preferable to stagger the terms ofthe initial handler members so that one serves an initial term of one year,one serves an initial term of two years, and one serves an initial termof three years. It follows that of the producer members, two should serveone year terms, two should serve two year terms, and three should servethree year terms. The record further indicates that the term of officeof the initial public member should be for two years. The proponents' briefsupported this procedure, and the proposed order has been revised accordingly.The record indicates that the initial terms of office of individual growerand handler members should be determined on a random basis. For example,it was suggested at the hearing that initial nominees draw lots to determinethe length of their appointments. As later described, industry committeemembers would be nominated at meetings held throughout the U.S. Therefore,it would not be possible to draw lots to determine the initial terms atthe time nominations are made. Nor would it be desirable to assemble nomineesfor the purpose of drawing lots prior to selection due to the expense thatwould be entailed. Therefore, the Secretary shall determine, on a randombasis, which of the industry members would be appointed to serve initialterms of one, two and three years. Such a procedure would be practicaland consistent with the record evidence. The record indicates that to provide a continual turnover in membershipand infusion of new ideas, the order should provide that no member mayserve more than two full consecutive terms on the committee. Any memberserving on the committee for two full consecutive terms would not be eligiblefor renomination as a member for a period of one year. The record indicatesthat the limitation on tenure should not apply to alternate members. Alternateswould be eligible for nomination as members or renomination as alternatesat the end of their terms as alternates. It would therefore be possiblefor an alternate to serve as an alternate and then serve two full consecutiveterms as a member of the committee before being ineligible for renominationas a member for one year. Such person would be eligible to serve in analternate position, however. It appears reasonable that the period of ineligibilityfor retiring committee members be one year because the pool from whichthe committee membership is derived may be limited by the number of qualifiedproducers and handlers willing to serve. Also, retiring committee membersmay provide a level of expertise and advisory talent that cannot be replacedover an extended period of time. In applying the tenure requirements to initial committee members, the recordindicates that the initial members serving a one-year term would be eligibleto serve two additional terms. The initial members serving two- and three-yearterms would be eligible to serve only one additional term. Testimony and the proponents' brief supported revising section 968.22 ofthe proposed order to provide for procedures for nominations of initialBoard members. However, the suggestion that nominations be made in meetingsconducted by proponents is not adopted. The order should provide that theSecretary conduct meetings for the purpose of nominating initial industrycommittee members and has been revised accordingly. At least one meetingshould be held in each of the four districts. All producers and handlersof record should receive notice of such meetings in sufficient time toenable them to attend. Nominations would be received and voted upon atthese meetings. Those persons receiving the highest number of votes foreach of the positions to be filled would be considered the nominee forthat position. The record indicates that the committee should be responsible for conductingsubsequent nominations. The order should provide that such nominationsmay be conducted by mail or at district meetings. In the event it is deemeddesirable to conduct mail nominations, the committee should recommend proceduresto be followed, which would be subject to the Secretary's approval. If nominations are conducted at meetings, at least one meeting should beheld in each district. The precise number, dates and locations of suchmeetings should be determined by the committee so as to provide all producersand handlers with the greatest opportunity to participate in the process.The testimony indicates that the committee, because of its knowledge ofthe industry, would be in the best position to select the most advantageoustimes to conduct such nomination meetings. Nominations should be supplied in such manner and form as the Secretarymay prescribe not later than October 15 of each year, or such other dateas may be specified by the Secretary. At least one nominee should be designatedfor each position which is to be filled the following January 1. Sufficientinformation about each nominee should be provided so the Secretary is ableto determine if the nominees are qualified to serve in the positions forwhich nominated. The proposed order should provide that only producers, including duly authorizedofficers or employees of producers, may participate in the nomination ofproducer committee members and their alternates, and only handlers, includingduly authorized officers or employees of handlers, should participate indesignating handler nominees. If nominations are conducted at meetings,only those qualified voters attending the meeting would be eligible tovote. In the case of producer member nominations, such persons should beproducers in the district in which they so participate. If a person producesgreenhouse cucumbers in more than one district, such person should electthe district in which such person wishes to participate in electing nomineesfor committee members and alternates. Likewise, a person who both producesand handles greenhouse cucumbers should choose whether to participate innominations for producer or handler representatives. Each person wouldthereby be allowed to cast only one vote in the nomination process. Thislimitation, however, is construed to mean that one vote may be cast foreach member and alternate member position which is to be filled in thedistrict and classification that person has chosen to participate. Provisions also should be made for the nomination and selection of a publicmember and alternate. The record indicates that the public member and alternateshould be nominated by the producer and handler members on the committeeat the first committee meeting following the selection of members for anew term of office. It is reasonable to require that the names of nomineesfor the initial public member and alternate be submitted to the Secretaryas soon as possible after the first regular meeting of the initial producerand handler members of the committee. The record indicates that a person nominated to serve on the committeeshould qualify by filing with the Secretary a written statement of thatperson's willingness to serve. This would prevent the appointment of anymember not wanting to serve, and would preclude the need to conduct additionalnominations. Testimony and proponents' brief recommended revision of section968.23 to delete reference to the term ``acceptance'' as confusing. Section968.23 of the proposed order has been revised accordingly, and in additionthe reference to a 15-day period for filing the statement has been deletedto provide flexibility in the order provisions. The order should provide that the members of the committee shall be selectedby the Secretary from persons nominated or from other qualified persons.Each person selected would serve in such capacity and for such term ofoffice as appointed, or until a successor has been selected. In the eventnominations are not made within the time and in the manner specified inthe order, the Secretary may select members and alternates without regardto nominations. Such selection should be on the basis of representationprovided in the order so that the composition of the committee will atall times be consistent with the requirements specified in the order. The order should provide a method for promptly filling any vacancies onthe committee for unexpired terms of office. There may be vacancies causedby the death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a member oralternate. The record indicates that successors may be nominated in thesame manner as provided for nominating all other members and alternates(i.e., at district meetings or by mail ballot), or in such other methodsas may be recommended by the committee and approved by the Secretary. Committee members and alternates will necessarily incur some expense whileon committee business. Reasonable expenses, which may include travel, mealsand lodging, should be reimbursed to members while attending committeemeetings or performing other duties under the order. Therefore, the ordershould provide that members and alternates, when serving as members ofthe committee, shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursedfor such expenses as are authorized by the committee and necessarily incurredby them in attending committee meetings and in the performance of theirduties under the order. Since the committee should be authorized to requestthe attendance of alternate members at meetings, even though the membersmay be present, the order should also authorize the committee to pay theirexpenses. The order should specify a procedure for the committee to conduct its meetings.It should provide that a majority of all members of the committee shallbe necessary to constitute a quorum and to pass any motion or approve anycommittee action. Accordingly, six of the eleven committee members mustbe present to constitute a quorum and enable the committee to conduct ameeting. Six affirmative votes would be required to pass any motion orapprove any committee action. In testimony and proponents' brief, it wasrecommended that a quorum should be present at the beginning of a meeting,but a quorum should not be required to exist at the time of voting. Thisrecommendation is denied because it would frustrate the underlying needfor a provision requiring a quorum. In addition, the proponents' briefindicated that a suggestion was made at the hearing that a quorum voteshould include at least one person from each district. The brief went onto state that such a change was unnecessary because the probability ofdominance of any two districts was remote. Accordingly, no change to theproposed order concerning this matter is adopted. There may be times when it will be impossible to assemble the committeepromptly to meet an emergency situation. In addition, there may be situationsin which committee action is necessary on minor issues that do not justifythe expense of holding an assembled meeting. Therefore, the order shouldauthorize committee members, and alternate members when acting as members,to vote by mail, telegraph, telephone or other means of communication,provided that any vote cast orally be confirmed promptly in writing. Ifan assembled meeting is held, all votes should be cast in person. Whenvoting takes place at other than an assembled meeting, a reasonable effortshould be made to contact each member or alternate. If a vote is conductedby mail, telegraph, telephone or other means of communication, seven concurringvotes will be required for any committee action. The committee should be given those specific powers which are set forthin section 608(7)(C) of the Act. Such powers are granted by the enablingstatutory authority and are necessary for an administrative agency, suchas the Cucumber Administrative Committee, to carry out its proper functions.The committee's duties as set forth in the proposed order are necessaryfor the discharge of its responsibilities. These duties are generally similarto those specified for administrative agencies under other programs ofthis nature. They pertain to specific activities authorized under the order,such as investigating greenhouse cucumber marketing conditions, and tothe general operation of the order including hiring staff and selectingofficers. The duties listed are reasonable and necessary if the committeeis to function in the manner prescribed under the Act and the proposedorder. It should be recognized that the duties specified are not necessarilyall inclusive, and it may develop that there are other duties which thecommittee may need to perform which are incidental to, and not inconsistentwith, these specified duties. As is discussed further under material issue (3)(h), the committee shoulddevelop a specific procedure to enable it to ascertain whether handlersare in compliance with the provisions of the marketing order. Such a procedurecould entail hiring an adequate number of fieldpersons to travel throughoutthe country to visit handler premises and audit handler records. The record indicates that the committee should be required to considerthe reestablishment of districts and the reapportionment of producer membershipamong the districts at least every five years. Redistricting authorityis necessary in the proposed order to enable the committee and the Secretaryto consider from time to time whether the basis for representation needsto be changed based on shifts in greenhouse cucumber production and acreagein the United States. As a result of such shifts, the number of producermembers allocated to a given district may be disproportionate to the relativeacreage or production in that district. Therefore, it is desirable to provideflexibility of operations so that if it would be in the best interestsof the industry to reestablish districts or reapportion producer membership,the committee may so recommend and the Secretary may approve such action.The record indicates that producer membership needs to be allocated ona geographic basis to provide adequate representation of growers throughoutthe country. While the committee is authorized to recommend changes inthe district boundaries, authority should not be provided to reduce thenumber of districts initially established. For the same reason, each establisheddistrict shall be entitled to at least one producer representative on thecommittee. The proposed order has been revised to reflect such provisos.Any recommendation for changes in district boundaries or reallocation ofproducer membership should be made well in advance of the beginning ofa new term of office. These changes should be made effective sufficientlyin advance of the date on which new terms of office begin, so that producersand handlers may be informed of any redistricting or reapportionment ofproducer membership prior to nominations. (c) The committee should be authorized under the order to incur such expensesas the Secretary finds are reasonable and likely to be incurred by it duringeach fiscal year. Such a provision is necessary to assure the maintenanceand functioning of the committee as well as to finance production researchand marketing research and development programs, and any other committeeactivities as the Secretary may determine to be appropriate. Necessaryexpenses would include, but would not be limited to, such items as employeesalaries and benefits; establishment of at least one office and equippingsuch office; telephone and mail services; and business related transportationfor the committee staff. Another expense would be the cost of reimbursingcommittee members and alternates for expenses incurred when they attendcommittee meetings. All such expenses may be incurred on an ongoing basis.The testimony indicated that in an effort to minimize expenses, the committeeshould investigate the possibility of contracting with another organizationfor management services to determine whether such an arrangement wouldbe cost effective. This could include shared office space and equipmentand the joint employment of staff. Entering such an arrangement would requirea written agreement between the committee and the other organization, whichwould be subject to the Secretary's approval. The committee should be required to prepare a budget showing estimatesof income and expenditures necessary for the administration of the marketingorder during each fiscal year. The budget, including an analysis of itscomponent parts, should be submitted to the Secretary sufficiently in advanceof each fiscal year to provide for the Secretary's review and approval.Testimony and proponents' brief recommended that the reference in section968.32 to ``marketing year'' be changed to ``fiscal period'' or ``fiscalyear'' for consistency with section 968.11. Accordingly, the proposed orderhas been revised to make this change. The Act authorizes the Secretary to approve the incurring of expenses bythe administrative agency established under an order and states that theorder must contain provisions requiring handlers to pay their share ofsuch expenses based on the amount of product handled by each handler. Eachbudget submission should therefore include a recommendation to the Secretaryof a rate of assessment designed to secure the income required to pay suchexpenses during the fiscal year. The rate of assessment should be established by the Secretary on the basisof the committee's recommendation, and other available information. Inthe event that an assessment rate is established which does not generatesufficient income to pay for the approved expenses, the committee shouldbe authorized to recommend to the Secretary an increase in the rate ofassessment in order to secure sufficient funds. The Secretary may approvean assessment rate increase, and such increase would be applicable to allgreenhouse cucumbers handled during the fiscal year to which that assessmentrate applies. No limitations on the annual budget of expenses or rate of assessment arespecified in the proposed order, and the level of each would be based uponthe committee's recommendation and the Secretary's approval. For illustrativepurposes, however, witnesses at the hearing indicated that an initial budgetof $320,000 would be reasonable. About 70 percent of the total expenseswas earmarked for promotion and research activities. In this sample budget,only $50,000 was allocated for ``Administration'' (which presumably includesstaff salaries and office rent) and $12,000 for travel. Given the nationalscope of this proposed program, it would appear that the actual expensesto operate this program could be well above the $320,000 discussed at thehearing. It would follow that the assessment rate of one cent per pound(based on estimated 1987-88 production of 38 million pounds) discussedat the hearing could be inadequate to finance this program. The assessment rate would be approved by the Secretary, based on recommendationof the committee. The committee would not be able to expend funds or assesshandlers until the Secretary approved the budgeted expenses and assessmentrate for the fiscal year. Although testimony generally supported levying assessments on a per cucumberbasis, some questions were raised as to whether a per cucumber basis wouldbe equitable, because greenhouse cucumbers vary considerably in size, generallyranging from 10 to 18 inches in length. One witness testified that a singlecontainer may be packed with a different number of greenhouse cucumbersdependent upon the size of the fruit. On a per cucumber basis, a case packedwith 18 greenhouse cucumbers would be assessed 50 percent more than thesame case packed with 12 larger greenhouse cucumbers, even though bothcases may weigh about the same. Also, different sized containers couldbe packed with the same number of greenhouse cucumbers. For instance, 12large greenhouse cucumbers could be packed in one container and 12 smallgreenhouse cucumbers could be packed in a smaller container. While theweight and volume of the two containers could vary, both would be assessedthe same amount. Although several witnesses indicated that another method of establishingany assessment rate might be preferable (i.e., on a per pound basis), proponents'brief indicated that the proponents strongly believed that assessmentscomputed in any manner other than on a per count basis would lead to inequities.In addition, the brief noted that greenhouse cucumber containers are markedas to count but not as to weight. Section 968.41 of the proposed order, as it appeared in the Notice of Hearing,provided that each handler's pro rata share of expenses shall be the fixedrate of assessment multiplied by the quantity of greenhouse cucumbers handled.Consistent with the testimony and proponents' brief, this quantity couldbe defined by count (i.e., the number of greenhouse cucumbers handled).The quantity handled could, however, also be defined in other terms (e.g.,the weight of cucumbers handled). This section, as proposed, would provide flexibility to determine the most appropriate quantity basis upon whichto levy assessments. Several minor revisions have been made in section968.41 for clarity. The order should provide for payment of assessments by first handlersof greenhouse cucumbers for maintenance and functioning of the committeethroughout the time the order is in effect, irrespective of whether particularprovisions of the order are suspended or are inoperative. For example,should a significant loss of a particular crop occur due to a plant virus,planned market support activities may be curtailed or cancelled. The committeeshould be able to continue levying assessments to pay other approved expensesincurred for other purposes. If a handler does not pay an assessment by the date it is due, the ordershould provide that the late assessment may be subject to a late paymentor interest charge at a rate recommended by the committee and approvedby the Secretary. These charges would represent normal, good business practice.This authority is intended to encourage prompt payments by handlers, andto compensate the committee for the loss of assessment funds when theyare not paid on time. The committee should be authorized to accept advanced payments of assessmentsso that it may pay expenses which may become due before assessment incomeis received. This would give the committee more flexibility in paying obligatedexpenses, particularly in the first part of a fiscal year before sufficientassessment funds are received. Such advanced assessment payments shouldbe based on the first handler's best estimates of future shipments, andshould, for accounting purposes, be limited to the current fiscal year'sshipments. The committee should also be authorized to borrow money on ashort-term basis to meet administrative expenses that may be incurred beforeassessment income is sufficient to defray expenses. However, the committeeshould not borrow money to pay obligations if sufficient funds alreadyexist in committee reserve funds or in other committee accounts. The committee should be authorized to receive voluntary contributions frompersons other than those assessed under the order for the payment of productionresearch or marketing research and development activities as describedin andSection; 968.50 of the proposed order. The record reflects that suchcontributions should be received by the committee free from any encumbrancesby the donor. The expenditure of such funds should be under the completecontrol of the committee and subject to the provisions of the order. Thecommittee should not receive a voluntary contribution from any person ifthat contribution could represent a conflict of interest. The proposedorder has been revised to reflect all such provisos. With the approval of the Secretary, the committee should be authorizedto carry over any excess assessment funds into the following fiscal yearas a reserve. If such excess income is not carried over as a reserve, handlersshould be entitled to a refund proportionate to the assessments each handlerpaid. The reserve should not be allowed to exceed approximately one fiscalyear's expenses. This limit on the amount in the reserve was supportedby testimony, and the three-year limitation contained in section 968.43as it appeared in the Notice of Hearing has been revised accordingly. One purpose of the reserve fund would be for stability in the administrationof the order during years of low production. Also, establishing a reserveshould minimize the necessity of the committee borrowing money at the beginningof a fiscal year or raising an assessment rate during a season of lessthan anticipated production. Finally, reserve funds could be used to covernecessary liquidation expenses in the event the order is terminated. Uponsuch termination, any funds not needed to defray liquidation expenses shouldbe disposed of as determined by the Secretary. To the extent possible,however, these funds should be returned pro rata to the handlers from whomthey were collected. The record indicates that funds collected through assessments or any otherprovision of the order should be used only for the purposes set forth inthe proposed order. The Secretary should at all times have the authorityto require the committee, its members and alternates, and its employeesand agents to account for all receipts, disbursements, property or recordsof the committee for which such person has been responsible. Likewise,when any such person ceases to act in the aforesaid positions, that personshould account for all receipts, disbursements, property or records ofthe committee for which such person has been responsible. In the eventthe order is terminated or becomes inoperative, the committee should appoint,with the approval of the Secretary, one or more trustees for holding records,funds, or other property of the committee. (d) The marketing order should authorize the committee to establish andprovide for the establishment of production research and marketing researchand development activities designed to assist, improve or promote the efficientproduction, marketing, distribution and consumption of greenhouse cucumbers.Funding for such programs should come from any authorized receipts of thecommittee, including assessment income, voluntary contributions, and miscellaneousincome such as interest. The committee should have the authority to initiatenew projects as well as to contribute funds to research which may currentlybe taking place. Witnesses testified that public funds for research are scarce and difficultto obtain. Proponents of the marketing order believe that the greenhousecucumber industry therefore needs to finance production research, especiallyin the areas of proper chemical usage, disease control and pest management.Potential research topics include control of cucumber mosaic which seriouslyaffects greenhouse cucumber production; powdery mildew which seriouslyaffects plant growth and fruit quality; post-emergence damp-off which retardsgrowth; and crooking, a serious physiological disorder which decreasesyields and reduces quality. Further, proponents testified that there areno varieties available which are resistant to these diseases, and researchunder the marketing order could be undertaken to develop varieties specificallysuited to growing conditions in the United States. The record indicates that any patents, plant materials, copyrights or trademarkswhich are obtained as a result of research funded under the order shouldbe the property of the U.S. Government as represented by the committee.The committee should be authorized, with the approval of the Secretary,to grant shared rights to the appropriate research institutions for anyrents, royalties, residual payments, or income from the rental, sale, leasing,franchising, or other uses of such patents, plant materials, copyrights,inventions or publications. The terms of any research agreement betweenthe committee and any research organization should specify the conditionsapplicable to the use and ownership of such patents, plant materials, copyrights,trademarks, inventions or publications. Such agreements would require theSecretary's approval. Witnesses testified that currently there is little statistical informationavailable on a regional or national basis regarding the production andsales of greenhouse cucumbers. The marketing research authority containedin the proposed order would enable the greenhouse cucumber industry tocollect the types of data needed to identify and analyze current marketsand find ways of expanding current markets and developing new ones. The committee should be authorized to establish, or provide for the establishmentof, marketing research and market promotion and development programs designedto assist, improve or promote the marketing, distribution and consumptionof greenhouse cucumbers grown in the production area. Witnesses testifiedthat one current marketing problem is the lack of consumer awareness ofthe unique characteristics and the uses of greenhouse cucumbers. The orderwould enable the establishment of an industry-wide program to acquaintwholesalers, retailers and consumers with the greenhouse cucumber and theproper way of handling the product. The committee should have the authority to enter into contracts with tradeor promotional firms or organizations to carry out such market researchand promotion programs. Market development activities should focus on consumereducation and improving the marketing and distribution of greenhouse cucumbers.The committee should distinguish between promotional programs which areallowed under the Act, and paid advertising, which is not authorized forcucumbers. No funds collected under the order could be used to financepaid advertising. Market promotion programs for greenhouse cucumbers carried out with fundscollected under the order must be generic in nature and should not useparticular brand names, handler or producer names, or favor any particularregion of the production area. In addition, promotional material may notmake false or unwarranted claims about greenhouse cucumbers or includestatements which disparage other agricultural commodities. All research and promotion projects to be conducted under the order ina given fiscal period should be submitted to the Secretary for approval.No funds shall be expended for such projects until they are approved bythe Secretary. This would ensure that all projects are appropriate, giventhe order's authority, and that sufficient funds will be available fortheir funding. Further, the committee should have the responsibility forreporting at the conclusion of such production research and marketing researchand promotion programs. It should also report, at least annually, on theprogress of such programs. Such reports should be made available to growersand handlers and to the Secretary. The record does not indicate the amount of assessment funds that wouldbe allotted for production research and market development programs. Thecommittee should have the responsibility to determine the amount of fundsto be spent on each program each year. Such determination should be basedon the needs of each program each year. The amount of funds to be spenton research and development programs would be included in the annual budgetrequired to be submitted to the Secretary prior to each fiscal period forthe Secretary's review and approval. (e) The marketing order should authorize the regulation of the handlingof greenhouse cucumbers by quality, size, pack or container, to establishand maintain orderly marketing conditions for greenhouse cucumbers.In order to provide the Secretary with the information necessary to considerand appraise any recommendation for the establishment or continuation ofany handling regulation, the committee should be required to prepare amarketing policy prior to each season. The policy should provide the committee'soverall assessment of the upcoming season and should be submitted by thecommittee prior to or at the same time any recommendations are made relativeto regulations for such season. It should include information relativeto the type of regulations expected to be recommended during the marketingseason. In developing its marketing policy, the committee should give considerationto factors which affect the production and marketing of greenhouse cucumbers,and the policy should provide a comprehensive evaluation of current andprospective supply and market conditions. Included in the marketing policyshould be an appraisal of the expected volume of available supplies, includingthe anticipated quality and sizes of the forthcoming crop, since thesefactors would influence any committee recommendation for regulation. Thecommittee should consider expected overall demand conditions for greenhousecucumbers, including demand in different outlets, since different handlingrequirements may be appropriate for the various markets. The committeeshould evaluate current and prospective supplies of competing commoditiessuch as field-grown cucumbers, imported supplies, and other vegetables.It would also be appropriate that the marketing policy discuss the trendand level of consumer income as they relate to demand for greenhouse cucumbers.Finally, the committee should include in its marketing policy any otherfactors which have a bearing on the marketing of greenhouse cucumbers.The committee's marketing policy should be written in report form and includenot only the committee's proposals for the marketing season and why ithas arrived at such conclusions, but also appropriate statistical dataand other facts which it considered in arriving at its recommendations.Such report should be as complete as possible so that the Secretary andthe industry may know what considerations were involved in the preparationof the marketing policy. The committee's marketing policies should be submittedto the Secretary and made available to producers and handlers in the productionarea as a means of keeping them informed of committee considerations. The committee, as a representative body of the industry, should be authorizedto recommend such grade, size, quality, pack and container regulationsas are authorized by the proposed order, and as would tend to effectuatethe declared policy of the Act. In making its recommendations, the committeeshould give consideration to current information with respect to factorsaffecting the supply and demand for greenhouse cucumbers during the periodor periods when it is proposed that regulations be made effective. Witheach such recommendation for regulation, the committee should submit tothe Secretary the data and information on which such recommendation ispredicated and such other information as the Secretary may request. Ata minimum, such information should include a clear definition of the marketingproblem(s) or condition(s) the committee's recommendation is intended toaddress; a discussion of the conditions that created or led up to thatproblem or condition; and an analysis of how the recommended action wouldserve to correct the existing problem or condition. Additionally, the committeeshould submit information as to whether there are viable alternative coursesof action that could be taken to solve the problem or condition, and whatthe expected impacts and results of the chosen course of action would be,including an assessment of the probable impact of the recommendation onsmall businesses. Finally, the committee should recommend the specificperiod of time the recommended regulation should be effective and why thattime period is appropriate, and an indication as to whether the actionis controversial or would raise any special problems, including the committee'svote on the recommendation and a discussion of the reasons for any dissentingvotes. Any recommendation for regulation should be made in sufficient timefor the Secretary to implement such recommendation by means of informalrulemaking. The marketing order should authorize the Secretary, on the basis of committeerecommendations or other available information, to issue various grade,size, quality, maturity, pack and container regulations which are necessaryfor the improvement of marketing conditions for greenhouse cucumbers grownin the U.S. Such regulations could: (1) Limit the handling of any particulargrade, size, quality, maturity, or pack, or any combination thereof, ofany variety or varieties of greenhouse cucumbers; (2) Establish, in termsof grades, sizes or both, minimum standards during any period when seasonaverage prices are expected to exceed the parity price level; and (3) Fixthe size, capacity, weight, materials, dimensions, markings, or pack ofthe container or containers that may be used in handling greenhouse cucumbers.The record indicates that the grade, size, and quality, of greenhouse cucumberswhich are shipped at any particular time have a direct effect on returnsto growers. Sales of poorer grades and less desirable sizes return lowerprices than do the better grades and sizes. It was testified that secondquality fruit sells at a significantly lower price than first quality,and in some years, prices for second quality product are less than thecost of production and packing, with no return to the grower. Further,the presence of low quality greenhouse cucumbers on the market decreasesoverall demand for the product, resulting in lower returns for even thebetter grades. A restriction under the marketing order of the shipmentof greenhouse cucumbers of such low quality could result in higher returnsfor the better grades marketed by eliminating the price-depressing effectof poor quality. The record indicates that there are many factors used to determine therelative quality of greenhouse cucumbers. One important factor is the shapeof the fruit. Top quality greenhouse cucumbers are those that are straight,and fruit that is curved or otherwise misshapen is considered to be oflower quality. Shape is an important factor not only because the straightergreenhouse cucumbers result in a more uniform and appealing pack, but becausethey can be wrapped more effectively. Although it is possible to shrink-wrapcurved fruit, the wrapping generally does not seal properly, allowing airto enter the wrapping. This results in accelerated deterioration of thegreenhouse cucumbers. Other factors relating to quality include color, with uniformly dark greenfruit considered the highest quality. In addition, better grade greenhousecucumbers are those that are clean, firm, free from decay, cuts or mechanicalinjury, and free from injury by scars, freezing, disease, insects, or othermeans. Any or all of these factors, as well as others, could be used toprescribe minimum quality standards under the proposed order. The record indicates that a minimum grade requirement could be establishedunder the proposed order. Such a requirement could be in terms of one ofthe grades defined in the U.S. Standards for Grades of Cucumbers [7 CFRPart 51], (e.g., U.S. No. 1 or U.S. No. 2). A grade requirement could alsobe in terms of a modification or variation of a U.S. grade. For example,a regulation could specify that greenhouse cucumbers be at least U.S. No.2 grade, but an additional tolerance for a specific defect could be allowed.Likewise, a grade regulation could vary the terms in the standards by prescribing,for example, a percentage of the grade that is required (e.g., 85% U.S.No. 1).The record indicates that the percentage of top quality greenhouse cucumbersproduced varies considerably among growers. One reason is that culturalpractices directly affect the quality of production. For example, testimonyindicates that crooked fruit can be detected very early in the growingphase. If misshapen fruit is pruned when first observed, the energy ofthe greenhouse cucumber plant then goes into producing additional fruit,increasing the percentage of straight cucumbers. Likewise, a grower's pestmanagement practices can affect the quality of that grower's output. Therecord indicates that the establishment of quality regulations under theorder could result in improved cultural practices among greenhouse cucumbergrowers. Further, the research authority under the proposed order couldbe used to determine the production practices that optimize fruit quality.The record indicates that authority should be included in the proposedorder for different regulations for different varieties of greenhouse cucumbers.While those varieties currently being grown have generally similar characteristics,there may be varieties produced in the future for which different standardsmay be appropriate. For example, one witness indicated that testing isbeing conducted on a new variety which looks promising, but which tendsto be shorter in length than currently available greenhouse cucumbers.The record evidence supports providing the authority to establish packrequirements for greenhouse cucumbers. As discussed earlier, greenhousecucumber shippers tend not to grade their product in accordance with theU.S. Standards, but use undefined terms (such as ``Commercial'') to designatequality. Further, some packers do not sort their supplies by quality andsize, and pack fruit of varying sizes and quality in a single container.The record indicates that the authority for pack requirements could beused to define the packs which may be used in shipping greenhouse cucumbers.Such requirements could, for example, specify that greenhouse cucumbersbe packed in accordance with the U.S. Standards and that each grade bepacked separately. Likewise, the committee could recommend that packedfruit be uniform in size, by establishing maximum and minimum sizes orsetting an acceptable variance. An example of a pack requirement existsin the U.S. Standards for Greenhouse Cucumbers. The standard pack requirementsspecified therein state that each piece of fruit be wrapped; that the fruitbe packed fairly tight in layers; and that the cucumbers in any given containervary by not more than two inches in length. The testimony was that suchuniform packing standards could reduce buyer confusion and contribute tomore orderly marketing conditions and higher demand for greenhouse cucumbers.The record indicates that the committee should be authorized to recommend,and the Secretary establish, such minimum standards of grade and size duringany period when greenhouse cucumber prices are above parity as will bein the public interest. Some fruit is of such low quality that it doesnot give consumer satisfaction. Because of the large amount of waste, consumersmay not receive proper value for their expenditures, and it therefore wouldnot be in the public interest to permit shipments of such low quality.The shipment of substandard product also tends to disrupt general marketconditions for greenhouse cucumbers and the discounted prices receivedadversely affect grower returns. The order should therefore authorize theestablishment or maintenance of minimum standards of grade and size inabove-parity situations. The marketing order should also authorize the Secretary to fix the size,capacity, weight, materials, dimensions, markings or pack of the containeror containers that may be used in the handling of greenhouse cucumbers.Such requirements would tend to promote orderly marketing conditions bystandardizing the containers used by greenhouse cucumber shippers. Thisauthority could be used to reduce the number of containers currently inuse, to establish specific weight requirements, or to require that, forexample, each container be marked with the count and grade of its contents.The order should provide for the modification, suspension, or terminationof any regulation whenever such action would tend to advance the objectivesof the Act and the order. The order should authorize such action basedupon recommendation of the committee, or other information available tothe Secretary. This authority would provide flexibility for times when,due to changes in circumstances, a given regulation is no longer appropriatefor prevailing market conditions, and thus, should be modified, suspended,or terminated, as applicable. The record evidence indicates that the handling of greenhouse cucumbersfor certain uses should be exempt from any handling requirements imposedunder the order, including payment of assessments, quality regulations,and inspection and certification requirements. The record indicates thatshipments of greenhouse cucumbers for consumption by charitable institutions,for distribution by relief agencies or for commercial processing into productsdo not materially affect the marketing of greenhouse cucumbers in commercialfresh market channels. Thus, such shipments should be exempt from mosthandling requirements. Similarly, exemptions from regulations or modifications of those regulationsshould be authorized for the handling of greenhouse cucumbers to designatedmarkets. Such authority could provide a vehicle for developing marketsthat are not now available to the industry and to recognize other situationsin which regulation may be unnecessary. Thus, the committee should havethe flexibility to recommend exemptions for shipments to certain markets(e.g., farmers markets) from any or all regulatory requirements. The recordindicates, for example, that foodservice operators may accept lower qualityfruit than do other buyers. If such is deemed to be true, such shipmentscould be subject to lower minimum quality standards or exempt from suchstandards altogether. To prevent possible abuse of the exemption provisions, the committee shouldhave the authority, upon approval by the Secretary, to prescribe appropriaterules, regulations, and safeguards to prevent greenhouse cucumbers handledunder an exemption from entering fresh commercial channels or from beingused for some purpose other than the specific purpose authorized. (f) The record evidence is that inspection and certification of greenhousecucumbers shipments are necessary, and are the most practicable way toassure that the handling of greenhouse cucumbers complies with the regulationsthat may be issued pursuant to the order. The Federal-State InspectionService has inspectors throughout the United States. At the hearing, arepresentative of that agency indicated that it would be able to provideany necessary mandatory inspection and certification which may be requiredfor greenhouse cucumbers. Thus, any inspections required under the marketingorder should be conducted by the Inspection Service in accordance withits accepted procedures, including those relating to positive lot identification,if required. Promptly after inspection and certification, each handler would submit,or cause to be submitted, to the committee a copy of the inspection certificateissued with respect to such greenhouse cucumbers. The certificate wouldverify that the greenhouse cucumbers meet the order requirements. The testimonyis that it would be the handler's responsibility to see that the certificateis submitted to the committee. However, the handler may arrange with theInspection Service for it to send in the certificates on behalf of thehandler.The record indicates that the proper time for the required inspection underthe proposed order would be just prior to shipment when a true appraisalof a lot can be made. Since greenhouse cucumbers are highly perishableand deteriorate over time, the order should authorize establishment ofa maximum time for which an inspection certificate is valid. Such authoritycould be used as necessary to require that greenhouse cucumbers be inspectedwithin a specified time prior to the time it moves into the channels ofcommerce. It follows that if the greenhouse cucumbers are not shipped withinsuch time, they would be subject to reinspection. The committee shouldsubmit to the Secretary for approval any recommendation concerning thelength of time the certificate is valid. Responsibility for obtaining inspection would generally fall on the personwho first handles greenhouse cucumbers since that handler is usually responsiblefor the grade, size, quality and pack of the greenhouse cucumbers beingshipped. However, there may be instances when it could be determined thatinspection would not be practicable. Subject to approval of the Secretary,the committee could prescribe rules and regulations governing the issuanceof waivers of inspection. Moreover, any such waiver would not relieve thehandler from complying fully with any other order requirements. The order should authorize the committee to enter into an agreement withthe Federal-State Inspection Service to collect from handlers the costsof inspection which would then be paid by the committee to the InspectionService. The record indicates that such an arrangement could serve to reduceoverall inspection costs, to the benefit of greenhouse cucumber producersand handlers. (g) The committee should have authority, with the approval of the Secretary,to require that handlers submit to the committee such reports and informationas the committee may need to perform its functions and fulfill its responsibilitiesunder the order. The record indicates that in the normal course of business,greenhouse cucumber handlers collect and record information that may beneeded by the committee. Handler witnesses expressed the belief that thereporting requirements that may be imposed under the order would not constitutean undue burden on their businesses. Reports could be needed by the committee for such purposes as: collectingassessments; compiling statistical data for use in evaluating market developmentprojects; making recommendations for production research; and determiningwhether handlers are complying with order requirements. The record evidenceindicates that to the extent necessary for the committee to perform itsfunctions, handlers would likely be required to provide information onthe quantity of greenhouse cucumbers handled each year. This informationcould include such items as the quantities of greenhouse cucumbers receivedand disposed of by the handler, the date of each such receipt and disposition,and the destination of such shipments. This should not be construed asa complete list of information the committee might require, nor shouldit be assumed that all of the above will necessarily be required of handlers.There may be other reports or kinds of information which the committeemay find necessary for the proper conduct of its operations under the proposedorder. Therefore, the committee should have the authority, with the Secretary'sapproval, to require each handler to furnish such information as it findsnecessary to perform its duties under the proposed order. Each handler should be required to maintain such records of greenhousecucumbers received and disposed of as may be necessary to verify the reportsthat the handlers submit to the committee. All such records should be maintainedfor two fiscal years after the fiscal year in which the transactions occurred.The order should provide that the Secretary and the committee, throughauthorized employees, shall have access to handlers' premises to examinethose records pertaining to matters within the purview of the order. Thisprovision would enable verification of compliance with requirements ofthe order. The proposed order has been revised to specifically refer tothe Secretary. All reports and records submitted for committee use by handlers would berequired to be kept confidential and the contents disclosed to no one otherthan persons authorized by the Secretary, except as required by law. However,the committee should be authorized to release composite information compiledfrom many or all reports. Such composite information could be helpful tothe committee and to the industry in planning operations under the orderor in promoting the industry as a whole. Any release of such informationshould not disclose the identity of the person furnishing the informationor such person's individual operation. (h) No handler should be permitted to handle greenhouse cucumbers, exceptin conformance with the provisions of the marketing order. The record indicatesthat if the program is to operate effectively, compliance with its requirementsis essential, and no handler should be permitted to evade any of its provisions.Any such evasion on the part of even one handler could be demoralizingto other handlers who are in compliance with the order and could impairthe effective operation of the program. Proponent witnesses indicated that this program would be self-policingbecause handlers throughout the country are familiar with each others'operations. However, leaving the function of ensuring compliance to individualhandlers would not be practicable especially in view of the size of theproduction area and the scattered locations of handlers. Accordingly, itis unlikely that compliance could be assured by the self-policing methodespoused by proponents. Additionally, some handlers ship directly to theend-user (i.e., the retailer), bypassing the terminal markets where violationsare often easily detected. Based on the record evidence, the proposed order provides as one of thecommittee's duties that it should investigate compliance with the provisionsof the order. The committee should develop a plan to determine compliancewith any regulation issued under the order, which could include provisionfor an adequate committee field staff to oversee compliance of this program.The functions of this staff could entail travelling throughout the countryto audit handlers' books. It is necessary that the committee maintain anadequate staff to carry out a responsible and credible compliance effort. (i) The provisions of sections 968.82 through 968.99 of the order, as containedin the Notice of Hearing and hereinafter set forth, are common to marketingagreements and orders now operating. All such provisions are incidentalto and not inconsistent with the Act, and are necessary to effectuate theother provisions of the marketing order and to effectuate the declaredpolicy of the Act. The record evidence supports inclusion of each suchprovision as proposed in the Notice of Hearing. Those provisions whichare applicable to both the marketing agreement and the marketing order,identified by section number and heading, are as follows: andSection; 968.82Right of the Secretary; andSection; 968.83 Termination; andSection; 968.84Proceeding after termination; andSection; 968.85 Effect of termination oramendment; andSection; 968.86 Duration of immunities; andSection; 968.87 Agents;andSection; 968.88 Derogation; andSection; 968.89 Personal liability; andSection;968.90 Separability; and andSection; 968.91 Amendments. Those provisionsapplicable to the marketing agreement only are: andSection; 968.97 Counterparts;andSection; 968.98 Additional parties; and andSection; 968.99 Order with marketingagreement. The Secretary is charged with oversight of the proposed order, and mustensure that such administration effectuates the declared policy and provisionsof the Act. The order should therefore contain a provision that statesthat the Secretary shall have the continuing right to disapprove any committeeaction. The order should provide that the Secretary shall terminate the marketingorder when termination is favored by a majority of producers who, duringa representative period as determined by the Secretary, produced more than50 percent of the volume of greenhouse cucumbers which were produced withinthe production area. The order should also provide that the Secretary conduct a continuancereferendum among greenhouse cucumber producers within five years afterthe effective date of the marketing order. Subsequent continuance referendashould be scheduled every five years thereafter. Such referenda would providean effective means of ascertaining whether producers favor continuanceof the program. Continuance referenda would ensure that the marketing orderis operated in a manner that is acceptable to growers and would allow producersthe opportunity to evaluate the program periodically. Testimony and proponents'brief recommended that section 968.83 be revised to provide for the samevoting requirements for termination and continuance referenda. With regardto termination, the voting percentages are the same as those provided fortermination in the Act. However, since less than 50 percent of all producersusually participate in a referendum, it is difficult to determine overallproducer support or opposition to termination of an order. Thus, to providea basis for determining whether producers favor continuance of the order,authority for continuance referenda should be included. Continuance shouldbe based upon the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the producers votingor producers of two-thirds of the volume of greenhouse cucumbers representedin the referendum. The Act requires that in the promulgation or amendment of a marketing order,at least two-thirds of the producers voting, by number or volume representedin the referendum, must favor the issuance or amendment of a marketingorder. Continuance referenda requirements are based on the same standardof industry support. The Secretary would consider termination of the orderif less than two-thirds of the producers voting in the referendum and producersof less than two-thirds of the volume of greenhouse cucumbers representedin the referendum favor continuance. In evaluating the merits of continuanceversus termination, the Secretary should not only consider the resultsof the referendum, but also should consider all other relevant informationconcerning the operation of the order and the relative benefits and disadvantagesto producers, handlers, and consumers in order to determine whether continuedoperation of the order would tend to effectuate the declared policy ofthe Act. In this regard, in the event of an adverse vote by producers ina continuance referendum, the Secretary may solicit input from the publicthrough meetings, press releases, or other means. Accordingly, this recommendationis denied. However, a change to andSection; 968.83(c)(1) is made to moreclosely reflect the language in the Act. Committee members and employees should not be held personally responsiblefor honest mistakes or errors of judgement that were unintentionally committedduring the time of their service on the committee. However, committee members,alternates or employees should be accountable for intentional acts of willfulmisconduct. The record shows that the committee should report any known,intentional acts of willful misconduct of committee members or employeesto the Secretary for appropriate action.Miscellaneous changes have been made in the proposed provisions of themarketing order for clarity and to make them consistent with the evidenceof record. Ruling on briefs of interested parties At the conclusion of the hearing the Administrative Law Judge fixed November1, 1988, as the final date for interested persons to file proposed findingsand conclusions, and written arguments or briefs based upon the evidencereceived at the hearing. One brief was filed by George H. Soares on behalfof the proponent group. In summary, the brief reaffirmed the testimonypresented at the hearing in support of the proposed marketing order andrecommended several amendments to the proposed marketing order. Each point included in the brief was carefully considered, along with theevidence in the record, in making the findings and reaching the conclusionsset forth in this recommended decision. To the extent that any suggestedfindings or conclusions contained in the brief are inconsistent with thefindings and conclusions of this recommended decision, the request to makesuch findings or to reach such conclusions are denied. General Findings Pursuant to the provisions of the Agricultural Marketing Agreement Actof 1937, as amended (7 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>) and  the applicable rules of practice and procedure effectivethereunder (7 CFR part 900), a public hearing was held upon a proposedmarketing agreement and order regulating the handling of seedless Europeancucumbers grown in the United States. Upon the basis of the record of thehearing, it is found that: (1) The marketing agreement and order, and all of the terms and conditionsthereof, would tend to effectuate the declared policy of the Act; (2) The said marketing agreement and order regulate the handling of greenhousecucumbers grown in the production area in the same manner as, and are applicableonly to persons in the respective classes of commercial and industrialactivity specified in, the proposed marketing agreement and order uponwhich a hearing has been held; (3) The said marketing agreement and order are limited in their applicationto the smallest regional production area which is practicable, consistentwith carrying out the declared policy of the act, and the issuance of severalorders applicable to subdivisions of the production area would not effectivelycarry out the declared policy of the Act; (4) There are no differences in the production and marketing of greenhousecucumbers produced in the production area which make necessary differentterms and provisions applicable to different parts of such area; and (5) All handling of greenhouse cucumbers grown in the production area isin the current of interstate or foreign commerce or directly burdens, obstructs,or affects such commerce. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 7 CFR Part 968 </ITAG>Cucumbers, Marketing agreements and orders, United States. Recommended Marketing Agreement and Order The following marketing agreement and order is recommended as the detailedmeans by which the foregoing conclusions may be carried out. It is proposed that Title 7, Chapter IX be amended by adding Part 968 toread as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 968_SEEDLESS EUROPEAN CUCUMBERS GROWN IN THE UNITED STATES </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Definitions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.1 Secretary. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.2 Act. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.3 Person. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.4 Production area. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.5 Cucumbers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.6 Varieties. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.7 Producer. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.8 Handler. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.9 Handle. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.10 Committee. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.11 Fiscal period. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.12 District. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.13 Container. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.14 Pack. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.15 Part and subpart. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Administrative Body </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.20 Establishment and membership. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.21 Term of office. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.22 Nomination. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.23 Qualifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.24 Selection. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.25 Failure to nominate. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.26 Alternate members. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.27 Vacancies. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.28 Powers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.29 Duties. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.30 Procedure. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.31 Expenses and compensation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.32 Annual report. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Expenses and Assessments </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.40 Expenses. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.41 Assessments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.42 Delinquent assessments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.43 Accounting. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Research and Development </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.50 Research and promotion. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.51 Patents, copyrights, inventions, trademarks, and publications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Regulation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.60 Marketing policy. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.61 Recommendations for regulation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.62 Issuance of regulations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.63 Modification, suspension, or termination of regulations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.64 Special purpose shipments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.65 Inspection and certification. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.66 Minimum quantities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Reports and Recordkeeping </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.70 Reports and records. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Compliance </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.80 Compliance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Miscellaneous Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.82 Right of the Secretary. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.83 Termination. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.84 Proceedings after termination. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.85 Effect of termination or amendment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.86 Duration of immunities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.87 Agents. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.88 Derogation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.89 Personal liability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.90 Separability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.91 Amendments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Marketing Agreement </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.97 Counterparts. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.98 Additional parties. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">968.99 Order with marketing agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 1-19, 48 Stat. 31, as amended; 7 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Definitions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Secretary. </ITAG>``Secretary'' means the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States,or any officer or employee of the Department of Agriculture to whom hasbeen delegated, or to whom may hereinafter be delegated, the authorityto act for the Secretary. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Act. </ITAG>``Act'' means Public Act No. 10, 73rd Congress (May 12, 1933) as amendedand as reenacted and amended by the Agricultural Marketing Agreement Actof 1937, as amended (Sec. 1-19, 48 Stat. 31, as amended; 7 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Person. </ITAG>``Person'' means an individual, partnership, corporation, association,or any other business unit. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Production area. </ITAG>``Production area'' means the fifty States of the United States of Americaand the District of Columbia.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cucumbers. </ITAG>``Cucumbers'' means predominately gynoecious cultivars of <T3>Cucumis sativus L</T3>., commonly known as seedless European cucumbers,greenhouse cucumbers, European cucumbers, English cucumbers, hothouse seedlesscucumbers, or greenhouse seedless cucumbers, grown by producers in greenhousesin the production area. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.6 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Varieties. </ITAG>``Varieties'' means and includes all classifications of cucumbers accordingto those definitive characteristics now or hereafter recognized by theUnited States Department of Agriculture. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.7 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Producer. </ITAG>``Producer'' is synonymous with ``grower'' and means any person engagedin a proprietary capacity in the production of cucumbers grown in a greenhouseexceeding 2500 square feet of climate-controlled, weather-protected growingarea devoted to cucumber production. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.8 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Handler. </ITAG>``Handler'' is synonymous with ``shipper'' and means any person (excepta common or contract carrier transporting cucumbers owned by another person)who handles cucumbers, or causes cucumbers to be handled. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.9 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Handle. </ITAG>``Handle'' is synonymous with ``ship'' and means to sell, consign, deliver,or transport cucumbers, or to cause cucumbers to be sold, consigned, delivered,or transported, between the production area and any point outside thereof,or within the production area: <T3>Provided, </T3>That under such rules and regulations as the committee,with the approval of the Secretary may prescribe, that the term handleshall not include the transportation within the production area of cucumbersfrom the greenhouse where grown to a handling facility for preparationfor market. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Committee. </ITAG>``Committee'' means the Cucumber Administrative Committee established pursuantto andSection; 968.20. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.11 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fiscal period. </ITAG>``Fiscal period'' is synonymous with ``fiscal year'' and means the 12-monthperiod beginning on January 1 and ending December 31, or such other periodas the committee, with the approval of the Secretary, may prescribe: <T3>Provided, </T3>That the initial fiscal period shall begin on the effectivedate of this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.12 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">District. </ITAG>``District'' means each of the geographic divisions of the production areainitially established pursuant to this section, or as reestablished pursuantto andSection; 968.29(n). (a) District 1 shall include the States of Alaska, Arizona, California,Hawaii, Idaho, Nevada, Oregon, Utah, and Washington. (b) District 2 shall include the States of Colorado, Kansas, Montana, Nebraska,New Mexico, North Dakota, Oklahoma, South Dakota, Texas, and Wyoming. (c) District 3 shall include the States of Connecticut, Delaware, Illinois,Indiana, Iowa, Maine, Massachusetts, Michigan, Minnesota, Missouri, NewHampshire, New Jersey, New York, Ohio, Pennsylvania, Rhode Island, Vermontand Wisconsin. (d) District 4 shall include the States of Alabama, Arkansas, Florida,Georgia, Kentucky, Louisiana, Maryland, Mississippi, North Carolina, SouthCarolina, Tennessee, Virginia, West Virginia and the District of Columbia.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.13 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Container. </ITAG>``Container'' means any type of receptacle used in the packaging or handlingof cucumbers. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.14 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Pack. </ITAG>``Pack'' means the specific arrangement, size, weight, count, grade, orany combination of these, of cucumbers in any type of container. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Part and subpart. </ITAG>``Part'' means the Order Regulating the Handling of Seedless European CucumbersGrown in the United States and all rules, regulations, and supplementaryorders issued thereunder. The aforesaid Order Regulating the Handling ofSeedless European Cucumbers Grown in the United States shall be a ``subpart''of such ``part.''<ITAG tagnum="84">Administrative Body </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Establishment and membership. </ITAG>(a) The Cucumber Administrative Committee is hereby established, consistingof eleven members, to administer the terms and provisions of this part.Seven of the members shall be producers, or officers or employees of producers;three of the members shall be handlers, or officers or employees of handlers;and one shall be a public member. Each member shall have an alternate whoshall have the same qualifications as the member for whom such person isan alternate. (b) Two producer members shall be from District 1; one producer membershall be from District 2; two producer members shall be from District 3;and two producer members shall be from District 4. Handler members shallbe selected from the production area at large: <T3>Provided,</T3> That no more than two handlers shall be selected fromany one district. (c) No producer or handler shall have more than one member on the committee.(d) The public member shall be neither a producer nor a handler and shallhave no direct financial interest in the commercial production, financing,buying, packing or marketing of cucumbers, except as a consumer, nor bea director, officer or employee of any firm so engaged. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Term of office. </ITAG>(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this section, theterm of office of committee members and their respective alternates shallbe for three years and shall begin as of January l and end the last dayof December, three years hence, or for such other three-year period asthe committee may recommend and the Secretary approve: <T3>Provided,</T3> That the members of the initial committee shall begintheir term of office upon appointment by the Secretary and that if theinitial committee is appointed after the beginning of a fiscal year, thatportion of the fiscal year shall not be counted in calculating terms ofoffice. Members and alternates shall serve in such capacity for the portionof the term of office for which they are selected, and until their successorsare selected. (b) The terms of office shall be staggered so that approximately one-thirdof the total committee membership shall terminate each year. Two producermembers and one handler member shall serve an initial term of one year;two producer members, one handler member and the public member shall serveinitial terms of two years; and three producer members and one handlermember shall serve initial terms of three years. (c) The consecutive terms of office of members shall be limited to twoterms, except for those three initial members who serve for one year shallbe eligible for renomination for two full terms at the end of their initialone-year term. Any member serving on the committee for two full consecutiveterms shall not be eligible for renomination to the committee for a periodof one year. Alternate members shall be eligible for renomination at theend of their respective terms. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.22</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Nomination. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Initial Members.</T3> Nominations for the initial producer and handlermembers shall be conducted by the Secretary. Nominations for producer andhandler members and alternates shall be conducted at a meeting or meetingsof producers and handlers in each district. A nomination for the publicmember, together with a nomination for the alternate public member, shallbe made by the initial producer and handler members of the committee assoon as possible after their selection. (b) <T3>Successor Members.</T3> The committee shall hold or cause to be helda meeting or meetings of producers and handlers in each district for thepurpose of designating nominees for successor members and alternate membersof the committee: <T3>Provided,</T3> That the committee may conduct nominations of producersand handlers by mail in a manner recommended by the committee and approvedby the Secretary. One nominee shall be submitted for each member positionon the committee and one nominee for each alternate member position. Suchnominations shall be submitted to the Secretary by the committee not laterthan October 15 of each year, or such other date as may be specified bythe Secretary. The committee may prescribe procedural rules, not inconsistentwith the provisions of this section, for the conduct of nominations. (c) Only producers may participate in the nomination of producer membersand their alternates. Each producer shall be entitled to cast only onevote for each nominee to be elected in the district in which such producerproduces cucumbers. No producer shall participate in the election of nomineesin more than one district in any one fiscal year. (d) Only handlers, including a duly authorized officer or employee of handlers,may participate in the nomination and election of nominees for handlermembers and their alternates. Each handler shall be entitled to cast onlyone vote for each handler nominee. (e) Any person who is engaged in both producing and handling cucumbersshall elect the classification in which to participate in designating nominees.(f) The committee members shall nominate the public member and alternatemember at the first meeting following the selection of members for a newterm of office. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.23</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Qualifications. </ITAG>Any person nominated to serve on the committee shall, prior to selectionas a member or alternate member of the committee, qualify by filing withthe Secretary a written statement indicating that person's willingnessto serve.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.24 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Selection. </ITAG>From the nominations made pursuant to andSection; 968.22 of this subpart,or from other qualified persons, the Secretary shall select committee membersand alternates on the basis of representation provided for in andSection;968.20 or as modified pursuant to andSection; 968.29. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.25 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Failure to nominate. </ITAG>If nominations are not made within the time and in the manner prescribedin andSection; 968.22 of this subpart, the Secretary may, without regardto nominations, select the members and alternate members of the committeeon the basis of the representation provided for in andSection; 968.20 ofthis subpart or as modified pursuant to andSection; 968.29. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.26 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Alternate members. </ITAG>An alternate member of the committee shall act in the place and stead ofthe member for whom such person is an alternate in the member's absence,or when designated to do so by such member. In the event both a memberand that member's alternate are unable to attend a committee meeting, themember, the alternate, or the committee, in that order may designate anotheralternate from the same district and the same group (handler or producer)to act in the place of such member. In the event of the death, removal,resignation, or disqualification of a member, that member's alternate shallserve until a successor for the member's unexpired term is selected. Thecommittee may request the attendance of alternates at any or all meetings,notwithstanding the expected or actual presence of the respective members.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.27 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Vacancies. </ITAG>To fill any vacancy caused by the death, removal, resignation, or disqualificationof any member or alternate member of the committee, a successor to fillthe unexpired term of such member or alternate member of the committeeshall be nominated in the manner specified in andSection; 968.22 or by suchother method as may be recommended by the committee and approved by theSecretary. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.28 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Powers. </ITAG>The committee shall have the following powers: (a) To administer the provisions of this part in accordance with its terms;(b) To make and adopt rules and regulations to effectuate the terms andprovisions of this subpart; (c) To receive, investigate, and report to the Secretary complaints ofviolations of the provisions of this part; and (d) To recommend to the Secretary amendments to this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.29 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Duties. </ITAG>The committee shall have, among others, the following duties: (a) To select, from among its membership, such officers as may be necessary,and to define the duties of such officers, and to adopt such rules or by-lawsfor the conduct of its meetings as it deems necessary; (b) To appoint such employees and agents, as it may deem necessary, andto determine the compensation and to define the duties of each; (c) To appoint such subcommittees as it may deem necessary; (d) To submit to the Secretary, at least 90 days prior to the beginningof each new fiscal period, or such other date as may be specified by theSecretary, a budget for such fiscal period, including a report and explanationof the items appearing therein and a recommendation as to the rate of assessmentfor such period; (e) To keep minutes, books, and records which will reflect all of the actsand transactions of the committee and which shall be subject to examinationby the Secretary; (f) To prepare periodic statements of the financial operations of the committeeand to make copies of each such statement available to producers and handlersfor examination at the office of the committee; (g) To cause its books to be audited by a certified public accountant atleast once each fiscal year, or at such times as the Secretary may request;to submit copies of each audit report to the Secretary; and to make availablea copy which does not contain confidential data for inspection at the officesof the committee by producers and handlers. (h) To act as intermediary between the Secretary and any producer or handler;(i) To investigate and assemble data on the growing, handling, and marketingconditions with respect to cucumbers; (j) To investigate compliance with the provisions of this part; (k) To notify producers and handlers of all meetings of the committee toconsider recommendations for regulations and of all regulatory actionstaken; (l) To submit to the Secretary such available information as may be requestedor that the committee may deem desirable and pertinent; (m) To provide to the Secretary the same notice of meetings of the committeeand its subcommittees as is given to its members; and (n) At least once every five years, to review the geographic distributionof cucumber acreage and production in the production area and, if warranted,recommend to the Secretary the reapportionment of producer members amongthe districts, or the reestablishment of districts within the productionarea: <T3>Provided, </T3>That the number of districts shall not be less thanfour and that each district shall be entitled to at least one producerrepresentative on the committee. Any such changes would require the Secretary'sapproval.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.30 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedure. </ITAG>(a) At an assembled meeting, all votes shall be cast in person and sixmembers of the committee shall constitute a quorum. Decisions of the committeeshall require the concurring vote of at least six members. (b) The committee may vote by mail, telephone, telegraph, or other meansof communication: <T3>Provided, </T3>That each proposition is explained accurately, fully,and identically to each member. All votes shall be confirmed promptly inwriting. Seven concurring votes shall be required for approval of a committeeaction by such method.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.31 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Expenses and compensation. </ITAG>Members of the committee and alternates, when serving as members, shallserve without compensation but shall receive reimbursement for necessaryexpenses incurred by them in attending committee meetings and in performingtheir duties, as may be approved by the committee. The committee may requestthe attendance of one or more alternates at any or all meetings notwithstandingthe expected or actual presence of the respective members, and may paythe expenses of such alternates.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.32 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Annual report. </ITAG>The committee shall, as soon as is practicable after the close of eachfiscal period, prepare and mail an annual report to the Secretary and makea copy available to each producer and handler who requests a copy of thereport.<ITAG tagnum="84">Expenses and Assessments </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.40 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Expenses. </ITAG>The committee is authorized to incur such expenses as the Secretary findsare reasonable and likely to be incurred during each fiscal period forits maintenance and functioning, and for purposes determined to be appropriatefor administration of the provisions of this part. The funds to cover suchexpenses shall be acquired in the manner prescribed in andSection; 968.41,and from such other funds which may accrue to the committee as authorizedin this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.41 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Assessments. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Requirements for Payment. </T3>Each person who first handles cucumbersshall pay assessments to the committee upon demand, which assessments shallbe in payment of such handler's pro rata share of the committee's expenses.Each handler's pro rata share shall be the rate of assessment fixed bythe Secretary multiplied by the quantity of cucumbers which the handlerhandled as the first handler thereof. The payment of assessments for themaintenance and functioning of the committee and for such purposes as theSecretary may, pursuant to this subpart, determine to be appropriate, maybe required under this part throughout the period it is in effect, irrespectiveof whether particular provisions thereof are suspended or become inoperative.(b) <T3>Rate of Assessment. </T3>Assessments may be levied upon handlers atrates established by the Secretary upon the basis of the committee's recommendationor other available information. At any time during or after a given fiscalyear, the Secretary may increase the rate of assessment as necessary tocover authorized expenses. Such increase shall be applied to all cucumberswhich were handled during the applicable fiscal year. (c) <T3>Advance Assessments and Authority to Borrow. </T3>In order to providefunds for the administration of this part before sufficient operating incomeis available from assessments, the committee may accept advance assessmentsand may borrow money for such purpose. Advance assessments received froma handler shall be credited toward assessments levied against the handlerduring the fiscal year. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.42 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Delinquent assessments. </ITAG>The committee may impose a late payment or interest charge, or both, onany handler who fails to pay any assessment in a timely manner. Such timeand the rates shall be recommended by the committee and approved by theSecretary. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.43 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Accounting. </ITAG>(a) If, at the end of a fiscal period, the assessments collected are inexcess of expenses incurred, such excess shall be accounted for in accordancewith one of the following: (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (a)(2) and (a)(3) of this section,each handler entitled to a proportionate refund of any excess assessmentsshall be credited at the end of a fiscal period with such refund againstthe operations of the following fiscal period unless such handler demandsrepayment thereof, in which event it shall be paid to the handler: <T3>Provided, </T3>That any sum paid by a handler in excess of that handler'spro rata share of the expenses during any fiscal period may be appliedby the committee at the end of such fiscal period to any outstanding obligationsdue the committee from such handler. (2) The committee, with the approval of the Secretary, may carry over suchexcess funds into subsequent fiscal periods as an operating monetary reserve:<T3>Provided, </T3>That funds already in the reserve do not equal approximatelyone fiscal period's operational expenses. Funds in such reserve shall beavailable for use by the committee for all expenses authorized pursuantto this subpart. (3) Upon termination of this part, any funds not required to defray thenecessary expenses of liquidation shall be disposed of in such manner asthe Secretary may determine to be appropriate: <T3>Provided, </T3>That to the extent practical, such funds shall be returnedpro rata to the persons from whom such funds were collected. (b) All funds received by the committee pursuant to any provision of thissubpart shall be used solely for the purposes specified in this part andshall be accounted for in the manner provided in this part. The Secretarymay, at any time, require the committee, its members, employees, agentsand all other persons to account for all receipts and disbursements, funds,property, or records for which they are responsible. (c) Whenever any person ceases to be a member or alternate member of thecommittee, such person shall account for all receipts and disbursementsand deliver all property and funds, together with all books and recordsin such member's possession, to the committee, and shall execute such assignmentsand other instruments as may be necessary or appropriate to vest in thecommittee full title to all of the property, funds, and claims vested insuch member pursuant to this part.(d) The committee may make recommendations to the Secretary for one ormore of its members, or any other person, to act as a trustee for holdingrecords, funds or any other committee property during periods of suspensionof this part, or during any period or periods when regulations are notin effect and, upon determining such action is appropriate, the Secretarymay direct that such person or persons shall act as trustee or trusteesfor the committee. <ITAG tagnum="84">Research and Development </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Research and promotion. </ITAG>(a) The committee may, with the approval of the Secretary, establish orprovide for the establishment of production research and marketing researchand development projects designed to assist, improve, or promote the production,marketing, distribution, and consumption of cucumbers. In a similar mannerany such project may be modified, suspended, or terminated. The expensesof such projects shall be paid from funds collected pursuant to andSection;968.41 or from voluntary contributions. Voluntary contributions may beaccepted by the committee only to pay the expenses of such projects: <T3>Provided, </T3>That(1) Such contributions shall be free from any encumbrances by the donors;(2) The committee shall retain complete control over their use; and(3) The committee is prohibited from accepting contributions from handlerssubject to the order, or any person whose contributions could constitutea conflict of interest. (b) In recommending marketing research and development projects pursuantto this section, the committee shall give consideration to the followingfactors: (1) The expected supply of cucumbers in relation to market requirements;(2) The supply situation among competing areas and commodities; (3) The need for marketing research with respect to any market developmentactivity; and (4) The anticipated benefits from such projects in relation to their costs.(c) If the committee should conclude that a program of production or marketingresearch or market development should be undertaken or continued in anyfiscal period, it shall submit the following for the approval of the Secretary:(1) Its recommendations as to funds to be obtained pursuant to andSection;968.41 or from voluntary contributions; (2) Its recommendations as to any production or marketing research projects;(3) Its recommendations as to market development activity; and (4) Any other information requested by the Secretary. (d) Upon conclusion of each project, and at least annually, the committeeshall report the results of the projects to the Secretary, producers andhandlers. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.51 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Patents, copyrights, inventions, trademarks, and publications. </ITAG>(a) Any patents, plant materials, copyrights, trademarks, inventions, orpublications developed through the use of funds collected under the provisionsof this part shall be the property of the U.S. Government as representedby the committee.(b) Funds generated by such patents, plant materials, copyrights, trademarks,inventions, or publications shall be considered income subject to the samefiscal, budget, and audit controls as other funds of the committee. (c) Upon termination of this subpart, the committee shall transfer custodyof all patents, plant materials, copyrights, trademarks, inventions, andpublications to the Secretary pursuant to the procedure provided in andSection;968.84 of this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="84">Regulation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.60 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Marketing policy. </ITAG>Each fiscal period prior to or simultaneous with making any recommendationspursuant to andSection; 968.61, the committee shall submit to the Secretarya report setting forth its marketing policy for the ensuing season. Suchmarketing policy report shall contain information relative to: (a) The estimated total production of cucumbers within the production area;(b) The expected general quality and size of cucumbers in the productionarea and in other areas; (c) The expected demand conditions for cucumbers in different market outlets;(d) The expected shipments of cucumbers produced in the production areaand in areas outside the production area; (e) Supplies of competing commodities; (f) Trend and level of consumer income; (g) Other factors having a bearing on the marketing of cucumbers; and (h) The type of regulations expected to be recommended during the fiscalperiod.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.61</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Recommendations for regulation. </ITAG>(a) Whenever the committee deems it advisable to regulate the handlingof cucumbers in the manner provided in andSection;andSection; 968.62, 968.63or 968.64 it shall so recommend to the Secretary. (b) In arriving at its recommendations for regulation pursuant to paragraph(a) of this section, the committee shall give consideration to currentinformation including but not limited to the factors affecting the supplyand demand for cucumbers during the period or periods when it is proposedthat such regulations should be made effective. With each such recommendationfor regulation, the committee shall submit to the Secretary the data andinformation on which such recommendation is predicated and such other availableinformation as the Secretary may request, including the following: (1) A clear definition of the problem; (2) The conditions that led to the problem; (3) How the recommendation will address or correct the problem; (4) Whether there are viable alternatives to address the problem; (5) What the expected results of the regulation would be; and (6) An assessment of impact on small business. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.62</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Issuance of regulations. </ITAG>(a) The Secretary shall regulate, in the manner specified in this section,the handling of cucumbers whenever the Secretary finds, from the recommendationsand information submitted by the committee, or from other available information,that such regulations will tend to effectuate the declared policy of theAct. Such regulations may: (1) Limit, during any period or periods, the handling of any particulargrade, size, quality, maturity, or pack, or any combination thereof, ofany variety or varieties of cucumbers grown in the production area. (2) Limit the handling of cucumbers by establishing, in terms of grades,sizes, or both, minimum standards of quality and maturity during any periodwhen season average prices are expected to exceed the parity level. (3) Fix the size, capacity, weight, materials, dimensions, markings, orpack of the container, or containers, or coverings which may be used inthe packaging or handling of cucumbers. (b) The committee shall be informed immediately of any such regulationissued by the Secretary and the committee shall promptly give notice thereofto handlers. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.63</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Modification, suspension, or termination of regulations. </ITAG>(a) In the event the committee at any time finds that, by reason of changedconditions, any regulations issued pursuant to andSection; 968.62 shouldbe modified, suspended, or terminated, it shall so recommend to the Secretary.(b) Whenever the Secretary finds from the recommendations and informationsubmitted by the committee or from other available information, that aregulation should be modified, suspended, or terminated with respect toany or all shipments of cucumbers in order to effectuate the declared policyof the Act, the Secretary shall modify, suspend, or terminate such regulation.If the Secretary finds that a regulation obstructs or does not tend toeffectuate the declared policy of the Act, the Secretary shall suspendor terminate such regulation. On the same basis and in like manner, theSecretary may terminate any such modification or suspension. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.64</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Special purpose shipments. </ITAG>(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person may, withoutregard to the provisions of andSection; 968.41, andSection; 968.62, andSection;968.63, and andSection; 968.65, and the regulations issued thereunder, handlecucumbers: (1) For consumption by charitable institutions; (2) For distribution by relief agencies; or (3) For commercial processing into products. (b) Upon the basis of recommendations and information submitted by thecommittee, or from other available information, the Secretary may modifyor relieve from any or all requirements, under or established pursuantto andSection; 968.41, andSection; 968.62, andSection; 968.63, or andSection; 968.65,the handling of cucumbers: (1) To designated market areas; (2) For such specified purposes as, but not limited to: (i) Sales or deliveries of cucumbers by a producer to a handler withinany area, (ii) Sales by the producer to the final consumer and not for resale; (iii) Sales by the producer to food service establishments; (iv) Packaging cucumbers for others; (v) Receipts, sales, or shipments of cucumbers already handled by anotherperson; and (vi) Shipments for research and development projects, as may be designatedby the committee, with the approval of the Secretary; or,  (3) In such minimum quantities as may be prescribed. (c) The committee may, with the approval of the Secretary, prescribe suchrules and regulations as it may deem necessary to prevent cucumbers handledunder the provisions of this section from entering the channels of tradefor other than the specific purposes authorized by this section. Such rulesand regulations may include the requirements that handlers shall file applicationsand receive approval from the committee for authorization to handle cucumberspursuant to this section, and that such applications be accompanied bya certification by the purchaser or receiver that the cucumbers were notused for any purpose not authorized by this section. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.65 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Inspection and certification. </ITAG>(a) Whenever the handling of any variety of cucumbers is regulated pursuantto andSection; 968.62 or andSection; 968.63 no handler shall handle cucumbersunless cucumbers are inspected by an authorized representative of the Federalor Federal-State Inspection Service and are covered by a valid inspectioncertificate, except when relieved of such requirements under andSection;andSection;968.64, 968.65 or 968.66. (b) The committee may, with the approval of the Secretary, issue rulesrequiring inspection on regraded, resorted or repacked lots, or providingfor special inspection requirements or relief therefrom. (c) Insofar as the requirements of this section are concerned, the lengthof time for which an inspection certificate is valid may be establishedby the committee with the approval of the Secretary. (d) When cucumbers are inspected pursuant to the requirements of this section,each handler shall promptly submit, or cause to be submitted, to the committeea copy of the certificate of inspection issued with respect to such cucumbers.(e) The committee may, with the approval of the Secretary, prescribe rulesand regulations waiving the inspection requirements of this section whereit is determined that inspection is not practicable: <T3>Provided</T3>, That all shipments made under such waiver shall complywith all other regulations in effect. (f) The committee may enter into an agreement with the Federal and Federal-StateInspection Services with respect to the costs of inspection required byparagraph (a) of this section, and may collect from handlers their respectivepro rata shares of such costs. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.66 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Minimum quantities. </ITAG>The committee, with the approval of the Secretary, may establish minimumquantities below which handling will be free from regulations issued oreffective pursuant to andSection; 968.41, andSection; 968.62, andSection; 968.64,andSection; 968.65, or any combination thereof. <ITAG tagnum="84">Reports and Recordkeeping </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.70 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reports and records. </ITAG>(a) Each handler shall furnish to the committee, at such times and forperiods as the committee may designate, with the approval of the Secretary,certified reports covering, to the extent necessary for the committee toperform its functions, each shipment of cucumbers as follows:(1) The name of the shipper and the shipping point;(2) The car or truck license number (or name of the trucker), and identificationof the carrier; (3) The date and time of departure;(4) The number and type of containers in the shipment;(5) The quantities shipped, showing separately the variety, size and gradeof the cucumbers;(6) The destination; and(7) Identification of the inspection certificate or waiver pursuant towhich the cucumbers were handled.(b) Upon request of the committee, made with the approval of the Secretary,each handler shall furnish to the committee, in such manner and at suchtimes as it may prescribe, such other information as may be necessary toenable the committee to perform its duties under this part.(c) Each handler shall maintain for at least two succeeding fiscal years,such records of the cucumber received and disposed of by such handler asmay be necessary to verify the reports submitted to the committee pursuantto this section. (d) All reports and records submitted by handlers pursuant to the provisionsof this section shall be received by, and at all times be in custody of,one or more designated employees of the committee. No such employee shalldisclose to any person, other than the Secretary upon request therefor,data or information obtained or extracted from such reports and recordswhich might affect the trade position, financial condition, or businessoperation of the particular handler from whom received: <T3>Provided, </T3>That such data and information may be combined, andmade available to any person, in the form of general reports in which theidentities of the individual handler furnishing the information is notdisclosed but may be revealed to any extent necessary to effect compliancewith the provisions of this part and the regulations issued thereunder.(e) For the purpose of checking and verifying reports filed by handlers'the Secretary and the committee, through duly authorized representativesshall have access to any handler's premises during regular business hours,and shall be permitted at any such times to inspect such premises and anycucumbers held by such handler, and any and all records of the handlerwith respect to the handler's acquisition, sales, uses and shipments ofcucumbers. Each handler shall furnish all labor and equipment necessaryto make such inspections.<ITAG tagnum="84">Compliance </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.80 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Compliance. </ITAG>No person shall handle cucumbers except in conformity with the provisionsof this part. <ITAG tagnum="84">Miscellaneous Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.82 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Right of the Secretary. </ITAG>The members of the committee (including successors and alternates), andany employees or agents thereof, shall be subject to removal or suspensionby the Secretary at any time. Each and every regulation, decision, determination,or other act of the committee shall be subject to the continuing rightof the Secretary to disapprove of the same at any time. Upon such disapproval,the disapproved action of the committee shall be deemed null and void,except as to acts done in reliance thereon or in accordance therewith priorto such disapproval by the Secretary. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.83 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Termination. </ITAG>(a) The Secretary may at any time terminate the provisions of this partby giving at least one day's notice by means of a press release or in anyother manner in which the Secretary may determine. (b) The Secretary shall terminate or suspend the operation of any and allof the provisions of this part whenever the Secretary finds that such provisionsdo not tend to effectuate the declared policy of the Act. (c)(1) The Secretary shall terminate, in accordance with Section 8(c)(16)Bof the Act, the provisions of this order at the end of any fiscal periodin which the Secretary has found by referendum or otherwise that such terminationis favored by a majority of the producers, who during a representativeperiod as determined by the Secretary, have been engaged in the productionof cucumbers for market: <T3>Provided, </T3>That such majority has, during such representative period,produced for market more than fifty percent of the volume of such cucumbersproduced for market, and that such termination shall be effective onlyif announced on or before the end of the then current fiscal period. (2) The Secretary shall conduct a continuance referendum every fifth fiscalperiod with the first such referendum to be conducted within five yearsfrom the effective date of this subpart, to ascertain whether continuanceof this order is favored by producers. The Secretary may terminate theprovisions of this order at the end of any fiscal period in which the Secretaryhas found that continuance of this order is not favored by producers who,during a representative period determined by the Secretary, have been engagedin the production for market of cucumbers in the production area. Suchtermination of the order shall be effective only if announced on or beforethe end of the then current fiscal period. (d) The provisions of this order shall, in any event, terminate wheneverthe provisions of the Act authorizing them cease to be in effect. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.84 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Proceedings after termination. </ITAG>(a) Upon the termination of the provisions of this part, the committeemembers shall, for the purpose of liquidating the affairs of the committee,continue as trustees of all the funds and property then in its possession,or under its control, including claims for any funds unpaid or propertynot delivered at the time of such termination. (b) The said trustees shall: (1) Continue in such capacity until discharged by the Secretary. (2) From time to time account for all receipts and disbursements and deliverall property on hand, together with all books and records of the committeeand of the trustees, to such persons as the Secretary may direct; and (3) Upon the request of the Secretary, execute such assignments or otherinstruments necessary or appropriate to vest in such person, full titleand right to all of the funds, property, and claims vested in the committeeor the trustees pursuant thereto. (c) Any person to whom funds, property, or claims have been transferredor delivered, pursuant to this section, shall be subject to the same obligationimposed upon the committee and upon the trustees.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.85 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Effect of termination or amendment. </ITAG>Unless otherwise expressly provided by the Secretary, the termination ofthis part or of any regulation issued pursuant to this part, or the issuanceof any amendment to either thereof, shall not (a) Affect or waive any right, duty, obligation, or liability which shallhave arisen or which may thereafter arise in connection with any provisionof this part or any regulation issued under this part, or (b) Release or extinguish any violation of this part or of any regulationissued under this part, or (c) Affect or impair any rights or remedies of the Secretary or of anyother person with respect to any such violation.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.86 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Duration of immunities. </ITAG>The benefits, privileges, and immunities conferred upon any person by virtueof this part shall cease upon the termination of this part, except withrespect to acts done under and during the existence of this part. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.87 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Agents. </ITAG>The Secretary may, by designation in writing, name any officer or employeeof the United States, or name any agency or division in the U.S. Departmentof Agriculture, to act as the Secretary's agent or representative in connectionwith any of the provisions of this part. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.88 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Derogation. </ITAG>Nothing contained in this part is, or shall be construed to be, in derogationor in modification of the rights of the Secretary or the United States(a) To exercise any powers granted by the act or otherwise, or (b) In accordance with such powers, to act in the premises whenever suchaction is deemed advisable. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.89 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Personal liability. </ITAG>No member or alternate member of the committee and no employee or agentof the committee shall be held personally responsible, either individuallyor jointly with others, in any way whatsoever, to any person for errorsin judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission,as such member, alternate, employee, or agent, except for acts of dishonesty,willful misconduct, or gross negligence. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.90 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Separability. </ITAG>If any provision of this part is declared invalid or the applicabilitythereof to any person, circumstance, or thing is held invalid, the validityof the remainder of this part or the applicability thereof to any otherperson, circumstance, or thing shall not be affected thereby. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.91 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amendments. </ITAG>Amendments to this subpart may be proposed, from time to time, by the committeeor by the Secretary. <ITAG tagnum="84">Marketing Agreement </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.97 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Counterparts. </ITAG>This agreement may be executed in multiple counterparts and when one counterpartis signed by the Secretary, all such counterparts shall constitute, whentaken together, one and the same instrument as if all signatures were containedin one original. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.98 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Additional parties. </ITAG>After the effective date thereof, any handler may become a party to thisagreement if a counterpart is executed by such handler and delivered tothe Secretary. This agreement shall take effect as to such new contractingparty at the time such counterpart is delivered to the Secretary, and thebenefits, privileges and immunities conferred by this agreement shall thenbe effective as to such new contracting party. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 968.99 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Order with marketing agreement. </ITAG>Each signatory hereby requests the Secretary to issue, pursuant to theact, an order providing for regulating the handling of cucumbers in thesame manner as is provided for in the agreement.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: September 29, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Daniel Haley, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-23737 Filed 10-10-89; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 3410-02-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>